The man with pierced ears is wearing glasses and an orange hat.
A man with glasses is wearing a beer can crocheted hat.
A man with gauges and glasses is wearing a Blitz hat.
A man in an orange hat starring at something.
A man wears an orange hat and glasses.
A young female student performing a downward kick to break a board held by her Karate instructor.
Girl about to kick a piece of wood in half while karate instructor holds it
A girl kicking a stick that a man is holding in tae kwon do class.
A girl in karate uniform breaking a stick with a front kick.
A girl breaking boards by using karate.
Five snowmobile riders all wearing helmets and goggles line up in a snowy clearing in a forest in front of their snowmobiles; they are all wearing black snow pants and from left to right they are wearing a black coat, white coat, red coat, blue coat, and black coat.
Five people wearing winter jackets and helmets stand in the snow, with snowmobiles in the background.
Five people wearing winter clothing, helmets, and ski goggles stand outside in the snow.
A group of snowmobile riders gather in the snow.
Group gathered to go snowmobiling.
A bride in a light pink dress poses for a picture with male relatives and is being photographed by a man in a cream shirt with white pants.
A man in light colored clothing photographs a group of men wearing dark suits and hats standing around a woman dressed in a strapless gown.
A photographer takes a picture of a group of one girl in a pink dress and 10 boys in suits and hats.
A man photographs a woman in a pink dress and a throng of men in suits.
Man taking a photograph of a well dressed group of teens.
A group of 11 people in winter wear such as beanies, skiing jackets, gloves and backpacks are standing in snow paddles outside a house made of ice blocks while a person in front of the door seems to be leading them.
A group of people wearing snowshoes, and dressed for winter hiking, is standing in front of a building that looks like it's made of blocks of ice.
The people are quietly listening while the story of the ice cabin was explained to them.
A group of people standing in front of an igloo.
Several students waiting outside an igloo.
A baseball player in red leaps into the air to avoid a player in blue, who is shortly behind him as he catches the ball, while other blue team members look on in the background.
A boy in a red uniform is attempting to avoid getting out at home plate, while the catcher in the blue uniform is attempting to catch him.
A baseball player coming into home plate with knee held high and the catcher right in front of him waiting for the ball.
A baseball player attempting to score a run before the catcher tags the player out.
A baseball catcher trying to tag a base runner in a baseball game.
A man wearing a reflective vest sits on the sidewalk and holds up pamphlets with bicycles on the cover.
Man in bright yellow vest displays bicycle safety information on street.
A man and woman talking are interrupted and a man covers his face.
A man in a vest is sitting in a chair and holding magazines.
A construction worker holds a sign about bicycling.
A mother decides to take her child on a piggyback ride outside their apartment complex.
A baby boy in a blue and white striped shirt is sitting on his mother's shoulders.
A mother and her young song enjoying a beautiful day outside.
A young woman is giving a baby a ride on her shoulders.
A woman gives a small child a piggyback ride.
A male volleyball player in red trunks tries to block the shot of the opposing player during a professional volleyball game.
Men playing volleyball, with one player missing the ball but hands still in the air.
A group of spectators watch a men's sand volleyball game.
Volleyball players compete on a sunny day at the beach.
Men playing volleyball in the sand.
A woman wearing a pink shirt and red apron stands in her restaurant holding food and surrounded by bagged breads, a microwave and the chalkboard menu up on the wall.
Woman wearing a yellow hat, pink shirt, and red apron is holding food in a kitchen.
Employee in pink shirt smiles for camera inside a restaurant kitchen.
A woman holding a bowl of food in a kitchen.
Women in store happily holding some food.
The person has a striped shirt on and is holding on to a rope on a mountain.
A kid rock climbing against the backdrop of a green valley
The person in the striped shirt is mountain climbing.
A woman in a striped shirt climbs up a mountain.
A young man climbs a rocky hill.
A man standing in a bar with a neon beer sign hanging on the wall
A man stands next to three video game machines and a beer sign.
A man stands next to a bank of computer gambling machines.
A man is standing by a group of video games in a bar.
A man stands next to three video machines.
A woman in a green tank top looking at a drill while a crowd looks on.
A woman using a power drill in front of a group of people.
A woman uses a drill while another man takes her picture.
A woman, in a teal tank top, holding a power drill.
Spectators about to watch a woman use a drill.
A woman wearing a pink sweater and eyeglasses is wiping a wooden table with a pink sponge.
A woman in a pink sweater and an apron, cleaning a table with a sponge.
A lady with blond-hair and glasses works hard to clean up her table.
A woman in a pink sweater cleaning a dining table.
A woman in a pink shirt cleaning a wooden table.
Native Americans are dressed up in native clothing and are participating in an activity together.
Three people are dressed in costumes and playing musical instruments.
Women, wearing traditional clothing, are reenacting native life.
A tribal performance of dance and song of three individuals.
The indian's are performing a sacred dance.
A man holding another man by the back of the head about to punch him in the face.
A man in red shirt displays his fighting technique on another man in gray shirt.
One man holds another man's head down and prepares to punch him in the face.
A man stands in striking position while holding his opponent's head.
A strong man is hitting to a person.
Six people ride mountain bikes through a jungle environment.
Men, surrounded by nature, are riding mountain bikes.
There are six men mountain biking in a forest terrain.
Six People riding bikes on a trail in the forest.
A group of people is bike riding in the woods.
Two blond women sit outside as people walk by wearing casual clothing and some wearing bookbags.
Two females in a sitting down in a highly populated area.
2 blond girls are sitting on a ledge in a crowded plaza.
A large number of people walk or rest near a fountain.
Two women have a seat in a busy metropolitan area.
Three people sit at an outdoor table in front of a building painted like the Union Jack.
Three people sit at a picnic table outside of a building painted like a union jack.
Three people are sitting at an outside picnic bench with an umbrella.
A couple of people sit outdoors at a table with an umbrella and talk.
Three people sit at an outdoor cafe.
A shirtless man is fishing, standing on large rocks that rest next to a boardwalk with a tall lamp post in the forefront.
A shirtless man in shorts is fishing while standing on some rocks.
A shirtless man in jean shorts fishing off the rocks.
A solitary fisherman stands along a riverbank.
A man with no shirt fishing.
A man in a military-type uniform is standing in the street listening to another man who has a piece of paper in his hands.
A man in uniform and a man in a blue shirt are standing in front of a truck.
A man in a blue shirt gesticulates as he speaks to a uniformed official.
A man in dressy clothes instructed a captain near a large truck.
We have to go there to look into the machine.
A man in glasses and an Asian woman are seated across from each other in a subway train.
Two men and one woman are sitting in a subway train.
Several people sit on a train.
People sit inside a train.
People on a subway.
A brown-haired child in green shoes swings on a swing in a park near the woods.
The sun breaks through the trees as a child rides a swing.
A child wearing Crocs sits on a swing in a wooded area.
A kid swings with his feet up in the air in a forest.
A child swings and the sunshine shines down on her.
A man in a red shirt and blue pants is going into a building while a dog watches him.
A man walking into a building while a dog looks at him.
A man walks into a maroon building as a dog looks on.
A man in a red shirt entering an establishment.
A man walking into s foreign building.
An older gentleman, dressed in jeans and a long-sleeved shirt, tosses a small red ball on the beach.
An elderly man tossing a red rubber ball on the beach.
A man in jeans at the beach playing with a red ball.
Man on the beach is throwing a red ball.
A man plays with a ball at the beach.
A wakeboarder performs a flip while being towed at high speed.
An upside down man doing a flip on a waterski board
A person did a side flip while water boarding.
A man hangs upside in the air over the water.
A person upside down on a water board.
A woman's lower body can be seen as she wears blue jeans and walks in front of a large sign depicting another woman wearing a black top and sunglasses.
A woman wearing rolled up jeans and a black shirt is walking past a bus carrying a shopping bag.
A woman whose head is not visible walks in front of a bus with an advertisement on its side.
A woman wearing rolled up jeans passing bus a pass whose ad appears to be checking her out.
A woman in jeans walks by a bus with an ad depicting a woman peering over her sunglasses.
A young man wearing blue jeans and a t-shirt sits in the grass, with a ball in the air.
A man in a red shirt is sitting on the grass, and a ball is flying towards him.
A man in a pink shirt is sitting in the grass and a ball is in the air.
A man is laying down in the grass at a beautiful park.
A man sitting in the grass as a ball flies by.
Red white and blue SUV patrolling the beach and shoreline on a cloudy day while seagulls walk in the sand.
A red, white, and blue security vehicle is driving down a rocky beach toward some birds on a cloudy day.
A truck driving along a beach near a flock of seagulls.
Orange SUV drive by the shore.
A car parked at the beach.
Two men wearing hats and holding canes are standing silhouetted against a large body of water with sunlight reflecting off the water and a tree to the side.
Two men wearing hats and using walking sticks are walking near a body of water during sundown.
Two men stand beneath a tree as they watch the sunset over the ocean.
Two mature hikers take a break and admire the sunset over the lake.
Two men playing golf near water while the sun is setting.
Three people dressed in blue, white and black leotards are being held up by the hands of a set of two people each on the ground dressed in the same outfit as people look on.
A group of male and female cheerleaders create three formations.
Nine cheerleaders perform acrobatics behind a row of chairs.
A cheerleading team doing a routine on chairs.
Male cheerleading squad performs at a park.
A young boy is looking at a checkers board with one fist leaning against his head as a partially visible adult sits across the table from him, in a room full of people sitting in chairs around tables.
A boy is playing checkers with an adult shown off-screen while a girl looks on.
Children are contemplating their next move in a game of checkers.
The children are playing a game of checkers.
Children playing checkers.
A man sits on a bench holding his dog and looking at the water.
A man holding a dog sitting on a bench overlooking a lake.
A man and a dog sit on a bench near a body of water.
A man and his dog watch the sunset from a bench.
A man holds his dog near a pond.
Woman dressed in blue sitting on a bench with a cane next to her looking through her purse with a stretch limo behind her with a man and a woman walking in opposite directions from one another.
A woman in blue looks in a black leather bag while sitting on a bench during a sunny afternoon while people and limousines passed behind her.
An old woman is sitting on a bench, while behind her a limo pulls up and two people in white are walking by.
Decorated limo passing by elderly woman waiting on park bench in Chinese street.
A woman in a blue shirt is looking in her change purse.
Light brown dog running towards something at the beach.
The large gray colored dog is jumping on the beach.
A gray colored dog walks in wet sand at a beach.
The brown dog is standing on the sandy beach.
A gray dog plays in the sand at the ocean.
An Asian woman wearing a Asian dress sitting among a group of cloths, with a woven basket on her lap.
A woman is sitting with a basket of cloth, surrounded by cloth.
An Asian woman selling silk scarfs, bags, and wallets.
A young oriental woman sitting amongst her belongings.
An Asian woman is selling colorful fabrics.
Woman singing with a microphone next to a person playing guitar.
A woman sings into a microphone by a guy playing a guitar.
A woman sings in a club with a guitarist behind her.
A female performer singing with her band.
A band performs in a dimly lit setting.
A girl is playing an electric guitar in front of an amplifier.
Guitar player performs at a nightclub red guitar.
A woman playing guitar in red and blue light
A girl plays her guitar on a dark stage.
A woman is playing guitar on stage
Three men and two women stand facing the ocean from the shore on a sunny day.
A group of people stand in the sand looking out at the water.
Five people standing in front of a body of water.
Two ladies and three men looking at the ocean.
Five people look out toward the ocean.
A girl is playing the violin in the street while her band mate on the guitar is talking on her cellphone with a confused look.
A female performer with a violin plays on a street while a woman with a blue guitar looks on.
Two ladies play the violin and the guitar on the street to entertain the passer byes.
Two women on the street, one is playing the guitar and the other is playing violin.
2 women are standing in a street playing a blue guitar and a violin.
A young girl with goggles strapped to her forehead enjoys the cool pool water.
A dark-skinned girl with goggles and black hair in water.
A young girl with goggles is floating in the pool.
A young girl swimming in a pool.
A young girl swimming in a pool
Three people dancing acrobatically in a subway station, with one girl in a skirt doing a cartwheel over another person bending over.
A person is cartwheeling over another person while a third person runs behind them.
Three teenagers in a subway playing around.
Four people in the subway are having fun.
Three people dancing in the subway.
A brown dog walks in the grass with its tongue hanging out.
A gray dog walks in the green grass, tongue hanging out.
A brown dog is panting hard on grass during a sunny day.
A tan dog jogging with his tongue hanging out
A dog running with tongue hanging out.
Two men sitting in front of a building and a field of grass in front of them.
A group of people are sitting on the grass outside of a rustic building.
People sitting in the grass outside a building, taking a break.
Two people sit on a grassy lawn in front of a building.
People sitting outside a house enjoying wine.
Several people, including a shirtless man and a woman in purple shorts which say "P.I.N.K." on the back, are walking through a crowded outdoor area.
Shirtless guy staring off in the distance while three woman are walking past a crowd sitting outside a cafe.
A shirtless man and three women walk outside near a street cafe.
Four people dressed for warm weather out on a street walking.
These people are walking in a crowd of people.
An African American man with a black hat and black tank top plays the drums on some buckets for donations.
A man in a black t-shirt, cap and jeans is playing drums on an upside down yellow pail.
A muscular African-american man pan-handling using paint buckets as a musical instrument.
One man in a black muscle shirt is playing the drums on some overturned buckets.
A man is sitting on the street playing drums on buckets.
A girl is outside painting a picture of a lady on the side of the wall using chalk
A woman drawing a portrait on a white wall with trees in the background.
A woman working on a painting of a young woman on a wall with tan skin.
A young female artists paints an image of a woman on a wall.
A woman is completing a picture of a young woman.
Two teammates from the USA team are jumping in the air to give high-fives while two teammates watch.
Two female members of team USA performing a jump high-five surrounded by two other female members.
Two volleyball girls team both jumping for a double high-five
A group of volleyball girls high-fiving each other in a gym.
Females, who are on team usa, jump in the air excitedly.
A man with long hair pulled into a ponytail and thick framed black glasses stands at a stove stirring a pot of boiling water.
Man with a white T-shirt and black rimmed glasses cooking a pot of food on the stove.
Young white male preparing food on the stove top.
A man stirring a pot of liquid in this kitchen.
A man with glasses stirs a pot on the stove.
Several people walking past a food cart on a city street.
A vendor on a busy street is selling food.
Picture of a hotdog vendor in the street.
A man is working a hotdog stand.
Hotdog stand on a busy street
A blond woman pours a glass of wine in a dim restaurant.
A woman in a restaurant pouring wine into a clear glass.
A blond-haired woman is pouring drinks at a bar.
A woman with a tag is pouring red wine in a glass
A lady in the kitchen is pouring wine.
A little boy is wearing a blue and white shirt while holding a toy animal that is either a crocodile or an alligator.
A small child wearing a blue and white t-shirt happily holding a yellow plastic alligator.
A little boy in a light blue shirt playing outside with a toy crocodile.
A young smiling child holds his toy alligator up to the camera.
A little boy holding a baby reptile.
A large woman with long pink hair dressed in black is laying on a tree trunk talking to a man who is crouched down next to her.
A red-haired woman in black is posing for a man while resting on a tree.
A girl with bright red-hair and black clothes is posing on a tree trunk.
A girl laying on the tree with a boy kneeling before her.
A woman with pink hair dressed in black talks to a man.
A girl leaps through the air while running on the riverbank.
A little girl jumps from one rock to another in a creek.
A girl jumping from one rock to another in a creek.
A blond girl wearing blue jumping across a stream.
A girl hops across the river, from rock to rock.
An old man with arms outstretched sits against a wooden wall between a woman and another man.
Old man with black shirt throws hands up while sitting next to white woman and white man.
A gray-haired man is sitting down with his arm stretched out.
An older man is opening his arms wide and looking perplexed.
A man in a gray shirt holds his hands in the air.
Three construction workers are digging a whole next to a wall in a field.
Three men wearing safety vests and doing yard work in a field.
Three men in reflective vests doing yard work in a field.
Three men in same colored vests are in the outdoors.
Three men work behind a short wall.
A woman takes a picture of a baby wearing a pink hat while a man carries her.
A man is holding his baby while a woman takes a picture of the baby.
A baby with a pink hat, held by a man in red and a woman in pink.
A woman takes a photo of a baby being held by a man.
Woman is taking a picture of a baby in a pink hat.
A woman with a black shirt and tan apron is standing behind a counter in a restaurant.
A female barista dressed in black is making coffee behind a counter.
A girl in a black shirt is smiling as she works behind a bar.
A happy woman is preparing a refreshment at a coffee shop.
A young woman is working in a kitchen.
A construction worker is driving heavy equipment at a work site.
A man in an orange safety vest is using a piece of machinery.
A man using a bulldozer on a construction site.
Heavy machinery in a construction zone.
Construction equipment at work.
Climbers with hiking boots and blue helmets ascend a snow covered mountain.
A group of hikers are climbing up a snowy mountain.
A group of people are hiking up an icy hillside.
Five people in full gear are mountain climbing.
A group of people are climbing in cold weather.
A child sitting at a restaurant table holding a paper mask against his face.
A child with a mask on sitting at a table with a plate in front.
The boy is wearing a cardboard scuba mask at the restaurant.
Child in a restaurant posing with a paper mask
A young child wearing a mask at Ivars.
A reddish brown dog walking in water carrying a stick in his mouth.
A dog is running through a creek with a stick in its mouth.
A brown dog wades into a lake to retrieve a stick.
A dog carries a very big stick through the water.
A dog holds a stick in its mouth in the water.
Two children wearing hats are standing on the shoreline, and a woman is holding one child by the arm while the other is fishing.
An adult wearing a black shirt and tan pants is standing at the water's edge with two children.
A mother teaches her two young boys to fish off of a rocky coast into very blue water.
Two young children and an adult are fishing on the shoreline near large rocks.
A family fishes off the edge of a beach.
A young child walks down a gravel path lined with a row of red outdoor chairs.
A racetrack with red chairs stacked beside fence with a child walking.
A child in a striped shirt walks by some red chairs.
A child walking and leaving a trail behind them.
A little kid is walking next to red banners.
A man in a blue shirt is kicking a yellow object while other students are practicing karate in the background.
A man in white pants and a blue shirt is kicking a yellow boxing bag.
A man is practicing his kicks on a punching bag in a gym.
Man in a blue shirt practicing karate.
A man kicking a workout bag.
A Chinese + man and younger boy in some type of worship place worshiping.
A young boy and an old men involved in some type of ritual ceremony.
Old woman in yellow holding tissue over young boys head.
Two Indian men participating in a ceremony.
Young asian man paying his respects.
Man in black pants and vest balances between to pillars, holding two flaming torches in his right hand.
A well-dressed man climbing between two columns while holding torches.
A man in a suit is straddling two pillars while holding a flame.
Juggler standing balanced between two columns
Man scaling wall with fire in hand
A group of musicians are performing on a stage in front of a crowd.
On stage photo of small band performing for theater audience.
A band on stage performing in front of a crowd.
A band plays on stage in front of an audience.
A band playing on stage for a crowd
Four white dogs are running and jumping with masks over their mouth.
Four muzzled black and white dogs racing over a jump.
Four white dogs with muzzles jump over a red wall.
A group of dogs wearing muzzles running a race.
Dogs racing
A woman stands in a field surrounded by three attentive gray dogs.
Three brown dogs are jumping up at the woman wearing blue.
A girl holds something while three dogs beg.
The woman and three dogs are in a field.
Three gray dogs jump at a woman.
A boy is hanging out of the window of a yellow taxi.
A little boy sitting in the window of a taxi cab.
A boy hangs out of a passing taxi cab window
A kid sitting in a window of a yellow taxi
The boy is hanging out of the yellow cab.
A man wearing jeans and boots is jumping into the air with a white sandy hill below him, and a blue cloudless sky behind him.
A man in a long-sleeved gray shirt and jeans leaps from a sandy hillside.
A man in a gray shirt jumps over the top of a sand dune in the desert.
A man in a gray shirt and hiking boots jumps off a sandy hill.
The man in the gray shirt is jumping off of the sand dune.
A man in a yellow coat is on a blue industrial crane working on the side of a tall building.
A worker in a yellow suit and red hat is working high above the city.
A worker in a yellow jacket is hoisted up high to work on a building.
A worker in a red hat and yellow coat is on crane lift.
A Heavy machine lifting up a worker.
A group of young people are listening to a man in a blue shirt telling them about Brazil.
A man is standing in front of a classroom full of students teaching about Brazil
A man in a blue jacket is standing in front of a small group of people.
A man in Brazil giving an informal talk to young adults.
A hispanic man talking to people.
A bunch of beer pull tabs at a bar with Christmas lights on the ceiling.
A picture of five people at a bar with a closeup on the beer taps.
A bald headed man is standing by the beer pumps at the bar.
Christmas tree lights hang on the ceiling.
A man in a bar.
A man dressed in all black is wearing shades and standing in snow and there is a red vehicle in back of him.
A man standing in snow in front of a red nissan jeep.
A man in black is walking to his truck in the snow.
Man in black standing by parked car in the snow.
Guy outside of his car stuck in snow.
Little white dog wearing a leash jumping after a red ball.
A white and brown dog jumps towards a red ball.
A small dog on a leash jumps toward a pink ball
A fox terrier leaps after a ball.
A terrier chasing a red ball.
A female police officer, wearing an officer's hat and sunglasses, stands in uniform in front of a window-lined street block.
A female police officer in a cap and navy uniform smiles while wearing sunglasses outside of a shop.
Young, smiling, blond female police officer from New York standing outside on a sidewalk.
An attractive young New York City policewoman pauses on the sidewalk.
A police woman smiling and wearing sunglasses and a hat.
A young girl dancing in her socks on a wooden floor strewn with pink balloons.
Child with pink strings on head dancing surrounded by confetti, balloons.
Little Girl in brown shirt and blue jean skirt dances on wood floor.
A little girl dances in a room with balloons on the floor.
The blond girl is dancing inside a house.
A large tan bulldog walking along the rocky shore of a small stream.
A dog with a snub nose smells for something on a riverbank.
A dog is walking through some gravel beside a river.
A large brown dog is walking along side a river.
A brown dog walks on the rocks near a river.
Woman in a white dress standing with a tennis racket and two people in green behind her.
Young pretty blond women holding a tennis racket dressed as if to begin a tennis match.
A young woman in a fashionable tennis outfit between volleys.
Slim, blond woman in white dress holds tennis racket.
A young lady in white holding a tennis racket
A girl jumping rope on a sidewalk with a parking garage to the left.
A girl jumping rope on a sidewalk near a parking garage.
A blond child jumping rope on a sidewalk.
A girl jumps rope on a sidewalk.
A small girl jumping rope.
A mother and two children opening gifts on a Christmas morning.
Two ladies and a little girl in her pajamas opening gifts
Older women and younger girl are opening presents up.
A family opening up their Christmas presents.
A little girl opening a Christmas present.
A dog with a black and brown marbled coat scowls at the camera while a young woman in a black suit walks in the background.
A navy walking wearing a black coat and pants on the stairs as camera focuses on the dog
A brown dog pays no attention to a young woman dressed in black passing nearby.
A brown dog standing at the bottom of stone, outdoor stairs.
A woman walking up some stairs.
An Asian man in a green uniform shirt with a white speckled headband is using a torch to cook food in a restaurant.
A man, wearing a green shirt, is cooking food in a restaurant.
Two men dressed in green are preparing food in a restaurant.
A check with a green shirt uses a blowtorch on some food.
Two men cooking fast food.
A man dressed in black leather and a cowboy hat is walking around a Renaissance Festival.
A man with a sleeveless black vest and a black cowboy hat is talking to another man.
A man wearing leather pants, a leather vest and a cowboy hat is standing here.
The man is dressed in all black and has a tattoo on his left arm.
A couple of men are standing outside a tent.
A dog wearing a cape is running through the snow.
Dog running though the snow in a green cover.
Dog wearing a coat running in a snowy field.
A dog wearing a cover runs in the snow.
Dog in jacket running through snow
A small black and white dog running on the beach with several people in the background
A fluffy black-and-white dog runs from three people on a sandy beach.
A shaggy dog runs in front of three people on the beach.
Dog in foreground with three people in background.
A family is playing on the beach with their dog.
A woman and little boy are smiling and the child is tasting something on a long wooden spoon.
A woman and a child embrace while the child tastes what they have been making.
A young mother is letting her child lick a wooden cooking spoon clean.
A woman holds a young boy who has a wooden spoon in his mouth.
A mother and child are baking.
A man wearing a baseball hat and jacket reads while sitting in an Italian restaurant.
A man in a black sweater and cap looks at a paper while drinking out of a wineglass.
A man is reading the newspaper while drinking a glass of wine.
A man drinks from a wineglass while reading the paper.
Man in black hat sipping wine.
A well-dressed man plays a grand piano during an art exhibit.
A man in dress clothing playing a brown piano.
A man wearing a all black and playing a piano.
A man in a black suit plays the piano.
A man intently playing piano.
Little boy wearing a dark blue shirt and yellow shorts playing with a soccer ball in grass.
A blond boy wearing a blue shirt and yellow shorts king a soccer ball.
A young boy wearing a blue jersey and yellow shorts is playing soccer.
A young boy in a soccer uniform prepares to kick a soccer ball.
A young boy on a Texas soccer team is playing soccer.
The dog tries to bite the water coming out of the sprinkler.
A black dog bites at a stream of water on the grass.
A black dog is being squirted with a jet of water.
A dog drinks water outside on the grass.
A dog drinks from a sprinkler.
A man is tilting his head back in a barber's chair, while his beard is lathered up before a shave.
The man with the brown hair is at the shop getting his beard cutoff.
A man is sitting in a barber's chair getting ready for a shave.
A man is lathered up and ready for a shave at a barber shop.
There is a large man getting shaved.
A man in a checked shirt is sitting at a table looking back at a group of people behind him.
A man sitting at a picnic table with a tray and partially consumed beer in front of him.
A man sits at a wooden table and looks away to a crowd of people.
A man sits at a table outside and looks toward the horizon.
A man sits at a table outdoors and watches people.
A small boy dressed in a black sweatshirt with a logo on it, holds a red bat in front of blue stadium seats.
A little boy is holding a skinny baseball bat while standing between two rows of blue seats.
A young boy in a team sweatshirt is in a sports stadium near blue seats swinging a red bat.
The boy wearing a black shirt and blue jeans is holding a red baseball bat.
A young boy practices his bat swing while in the stands with blue seats.
Greyhounds racing chasing a mechanical rabbit around the track.
Four dogs in blue, green, red and black jerseys are racing.
Dogs with muzzles are racing around a sandy track.
Four dogs race around a turn.
Dogs run at a dog racetrack.
A shirtless man with tattoos, glasses and a baseball hat, touching a spotlight that is on.
A light technician man with tribal tattoos aiming a spotlight over a balcony.
A man with tattoo's is reflecting light to a stage.
A white man working a spotlight with no shirt on.
A middle-aged male is holding a spotlight.
Two boys holding a green rope and competing against each other on a balancing rod, while others look on.
Two boys are standing on a balance beam while playing with a green rope.
Two young boys playing a game on a log while other kids look on.
Two kids are balancing on a log and holding a rope.
Two boys on a balance beam holding a rope
The motorcycle is being ridden on a track whilst pulling a wheelie.
A man riding a motorcycle is performing a trick at a track.
A man puts his motorcycle up on its rear wheel on a track.
A man stands on his motorcycle while doing a wheelie.
A man doing tricks on a motorcycle
A black dog is slowly crossing a fallen log that is outstretched over a stream of water.
The black dog is walking along a tree trunk bridge over water.
A dog crossing a river on a bridge made of a fallen tree.
The dog walks across the stream on a fallen log.
A dog walks on a log across a small river.
A small crowd gathered at a local seaman monument holding umbrellas.
A crowd forms on a busy street to watch a street performer.
A group of people watching a performer on a sidewalk.
The group of people are all covered by umbrellas.
A group of people stand under umbrellas.
A man uses a bicycle to transport a sight that says "Lovely," while another man on a motor scooter drives by.
A bicyclist passes with a giant sign that reads "lovely."
A man advertises with a giant sign tied onto his bicycle.
A long, green board that has "lovely" written on it.
A man on a moped is riding down the street.
At an outdoor event, one man is speaking into a megaphone while another man is holding the megaphone.
Two young people in blue shirts share a megaphone at some kind of festival with a Greenpeace tent.
Two young men in blue holding a loudspeaker with one talking.
Two people in blue shirts are outside with a bullhorn.
Two people in blue shirts using a megaphone.
A man in an orange vest works near a blue-draped fence and black and orange wires.
Construction worker in orange vest and white hard hat with a shovel.
A worker in a hard hat and orange vest is working.
A town worker working on electrical equipment.
A worker in an orange vest is using a shovel.
Two men wearing helmets and orange suits are having a conversation at a construction site.
Two construction workers have a discussion while on the work site.
Two construction workers with orange jackets are talking.
Construction workers in orange talking.
Two men with hard hats are talking.
Two men are walking up a ramp while a third walks up a separate ramp in the opposite direction.
Two men walk up a ramp, as another man in a blue shirt walks along a road below them.
The people are walking up the ramp and the man in walking on the road.
Three men are walking up hill.
Three people walking uphill
An Asian bride, wearing a white wedding dress, is holding a bouquet of flowers while her bridesmaids are standing in the background.
An Asian woman in a floral wedding dress poses on a bridge close to her bridesmaids.
A bride poses on a boardwalk while her bridal party stands behind her.
A woman in white marriage dress poses with Flowers in her hand
A bride and her bridesmaids are posing for a picture.
A man with a rolling stones t-shirt on with beige pants sitting in a highchair adjusting a black guitar
Young man wearing a rolling stones black t-shirt playing a guitar.
A young shaved head man is tuning his guitar.
A young man tunes his guitar in the kitchen.
A guy sitting on a chair tunes his guitar.
A group of boys in swim gear is playing in a field surrounded by trees.
Three boys are playing with sponges and buckets of water.
Three kids throwing water balloons.
Boys in shorts jump and play outside
Three young boys play outside.
A group of young adults taking a break from boating.
Several young people congregating by two canoes.
People chilling in at forest next to canoes.
Six people are sitting behind two kayaks.
Friends are going canoeing.
A man in an orange kayak and a man in a blue kayak paddle around a beautiful lake.
A blue boat and orange boat float among lilypads in an outdoor setting.
Two men is separate canoes are in an area full of lillypads.
Two guys are kayaking, one orange one blue, down a creek.
Two men are paddling their small canoes through the water.
A young woman in a red sweater and jeans sits on the ledge of a red gazebo on a sunny day.
Somber faced woman wearing dark jeans and a red top sitting on the edge of a porch.
A lady wearing a redish sweater and jeans is sitting with hands on her left knee
A woman in a red jacket and blue jeans is sitting in front of a red arch.
A girl in a red sweater sitting in an archway.
Two performers putting on a mock fight for an audience that is watching attentively.
Two men participate in a recreation of a medieval sword fight while a crowd watches.
Two people putting on a show at the Renaissance fair.
Two people recreating a medieval fight.
Two men pretend to be knights.
The man in the yellow jacket is cooking over an open fire as the little boy watches.
A person holds a frying pan over an open fire as a child watches.
A man in a yellow coat tends a fire, a boy in a parka watches.
A person cooking on a fire while a small child watches.
The adult cooks over the fire as the child looks on.
A barefooted little girl in a pink dress is mid-flight in a jump.
A young barefoot girl in a pink dress is jumping outside.
A little girl is jumping in a green landscape.
Little girl in pink dress running in grass
The girl loves her pink dress.
People gather under a white tent while some sit at tables.
People sitting at tables at some sort of festival.
The people are sitting and mingling near the tent.
Many people are sitting around a tent outside.
People are gathered in a park.
A girl in a yellow bathing suit laughs and points at a girl in an orange suit while another girls looks on.
Girl in bathing suit pointing and laughing at child in orange bathing bottoms while another girl looks on
The girl in yellow is laughing at the girl wearing orange whilst being watched by the girl in blue.
Three children in swimsuites are having fun outside near a white building.
Little girls in swimsuits are laughing
Two brown and white dogs play roughly in a clearing of a wooded area.
Two dogs are biting each other in the woods.
Two brown dogs playing in a rough manner.
Two brown dogs fight on the leafy ground.
Two brown dogs wearing collars fighting.
A man in a chef's uniform holding a large skillet over a stove, with fire coming out of the skillet.
A man wearing all white (including a bandanna) cooking something and making a huge flame.
A man with a mustache and beard is holding a frying pan that has flames rising from it.
A man watches a pan catch fire while cooking in the kitchen.
A man in a white shirt is holding a flaming pot.
A young man sitting on a rock above a body of water, fishing rod in hand.
A young red-haired man is fishing and caught some seaweed.
A person holding a fishing pole next to the water.
A man in a black shirt fishing on a rocky shore.
The man fishing while sitting on the cliff.
The brown dog has a hold of the other dogs cheek with its teeth.
A brown dog is biting a white and tan dog on the snout.
Two dogs are nuzzling each other nose to nose.
Two dogs bite at each other on the carpet.
Dogs playing
A man in a hat and a man in glasses talk on the side of the road as a man walks past them.
Two men are standing on the street talking while another walks by.
Two men stop on the sidewalk to chat as a third passes by.
Two men stop to chat on the sidewalk as a car passes by.
Two men are discussing something.
Several people walking at the park with a little girl in green shirt holding on to an adult wearing a white shirt.
A girl in green with glittery fairy wings holds a woman's hand as they walk down a path in a park.
Men and women strolling in the park on the sidewalk.
People walking on a trail in a tree filled park.
A child walks next to a woman down a park path.
Three people, wearing dark clothes, get together for a close hug, outside of a cafe.
A black man and his two white friends are putting their heads close together.
Three friends at a cafe taking a photo-op.
Three people wearing black are posing.
A woman sitting with two men hugging.
In rural outdoors, blond woman sits on roof of yellow BMW vehicle, two people inside.
Two people drive a Jeep while a lady sits on the top of it.
A girl wearing camouflage pants sits on top of a Hummer.
A four wheel drive vehicle is driving on a dirt track.
Girl on roof of jeep being driven down road
A light dog climbing a wall of dirt.
A dog climbing a steep dirt hill.
A great Dane climbing a steep hill
A light brown dog is running up.
A dog climbs a hill.
Young boy smiles as an extremely large kelly green fly perches on his nose.
A green beetle is resting upon a freckled nose of a young boy.
Boy that is outside with a green bug sitting on his nose.
A boy poses with a large green insect on his nose.
A boy with a winged bug perched on his nose.
Man with gray beard sitting on the sidewalk with bags on either side of him.
A man sits on a step with two duffel bags and a plastic bag by his sides.
Bald, older man sits in gray stone area with bags, clapping hands.
A man wearing sandals sits on the sidewalk near some bags.
Man with duffel bag sitting on a concrete curb.
A young man looks at a coffee marker on the shelf of a department store.
A male teen in a white hat looks at a coffee maker at the store.
One young man is looking at coffee makers in a store.
A teenage boy is looking at coffee makers at Walmart.
A kid is looking at coffee machines inside a store.
A woman and a few children in an alleyway in between a vehicle and a fence.
A woman in a floral dress talks to children in front of a van.
A woman talking to four little children outside.
A mother with her four children.
A family between a van and fence
A man with glasses wearing a tuxedo and corsage stands near a man in a suit at a formal event.
A man in a tux and a man in a shirt and tie talk outside.
Two men are having a discussion after a wedding.
Two well-dressed men chat.
A man on his wedding day.
A woman in a blue t-shirt and jeans is sweeping concrete.
A young woman with a black shirt and jeans sweeping.
A young woman sweeping with a straw broom.
A woman sweeps the foundation of a house.
Individuals are building a house.
A skateboarder is riding his board along the boundary stone of a parking lot.
A man does skateboard tricks in a parking lot at night.
A skateboard is grinding on a curb with his skateboard.
A boy in shorts doing a skateboard trick.
A skateboarder grinds a curb.
A young African american boy with red pants standing in front of a house.
A little boy dressed in red pants is standing in the street.
Little boy in red pants, no shirt, picking his teeth.
A small child with a distended stomach stands alone.
Child in the road have no clothes
The camera was tilted to the side to show this small room containing a number of different umbrellas in solid colors of red, blue, and black, most of them open and on the floor, while a woman stands behind them near the door to the room.
Open, scatteredly placed umbrellas, fill an exit to a room with black trim doors while a blurry individual looks directly into the camera.
A woman stands in the doorway of a room filled with open umbrellas in this slanted photo.
A woman texts on her phone while surrounded by umbrellas.
Umbrellas and junk sitting in a messy room.
An woman wearing a light-blue shirt adjusts her hair while sitting at a table.
A girl wearing a blue shirt fixing her hair while looking into a pink mirror.
An Asian woman fixing her hair and makeup.
An Asian woman pinning her hair back.
A Asian women does her hair
A dog is jumping over a series of colored gates.
A black and white dog is jumping over a hurdle.
A dog hurdles over a series of poles.
A small black dog jumping over gates
A dog jumping over a beam
A man with brown hair and a green shirt is playing a trumpet.
A brown-haired man in a green shirt plays a trumpet outdoors.
A man in a green shirt playing the trombone.
A man in a green shirt is playing a trumpet.
A man is playing music with a trumpet.
A group of colorful children in a room with a green carpet on the maroon floors.
A group of children are sitting and standing in a building with a red floor.
A group of children sit on a blue mat while they eat out of bowls.
A group of children sitting on the floor, eating snacks at school
Several children sitting on the floor in a metal building.
A black boy in orange and white trucks on playing in the sand.
A young child wearing a striped bathing suit sits on the sand.
The boy sits in the sand with no shirt.
A black boy is sitting in the sand.
A boy plays in the sand.
A group of people sit near a large red brick building in the grass.
A red building with people sitting outside on the lawn in front.
It looks like a school with children sitting outside of it.
Some students sit outside school buildings in the grass.
People sitting in a circle outside a large building.
The two dogs, one of which is leaping in the air, are chasing a ball outdoors.
One dog leaps to catch a softball while another looks on.
Two small dogs pursuing a ball across a grassy field.
Two dogs play catch with a ball in a field.
Two dogs jump for a ball on a green field.
A brown dog waits for the Frisbee to come down before catching it.
Dog standing in grass playing with green flying disc
A brown dog about to catch a green Frisbee.
A dog gets ready to catch a Frisbee.
A dog catching a Frisbee.
A band performing on stage while the crowd observes with there hands in the air.
A band performs before their fans as they put their hands in the air.
A musical concert with a crowd cheering to the band on stage.
Fans cheer as the band plays a song.
A band plays a concert for fans.
White man with a green shirt and denim pants with a hammer and chisel, creating some sort of artwork.
A man with chin-length light hair works on a sculpture.
A man creates a sculpture with a hammer and chisel.
A man pounds on an artwork perched on a cart.
A man is swinging a tool at his sculpture.
A mountain biker makes his way up a grassy path on his red bicycle.
Someone in a yellow jacket mountain biking on a red bike.
A mountain biker rides up a hill on a red bicycle.
A mountain biker with a backpack crests a ridge.
A man on a bicycle rides on a mountain.
A dark-haired boy carrying a small hoe leaps across a narrow ditch while wearing rain boots.
A little girl is running wearing boots and holding a shovel.
Young boy running in the dirt with a small handheld shovel.
A brunet child, wearing rain boots is playing in the dirt.
A boy with blue and yellow rain boots runs on dirt.
Woman in orange jacket is sitting crossed legged on a bench while woman in blue is leaning against the glass.
A dark-haired woman wearing glasses, a red jacket and jeans sitting on a bench on the sidewalk.
A woman in an orange windbreaker waits with a woman in a navy blue shirt for the bus.
A woman in an orange jacket sits on a bench.
People waiting at a bus stop.
A practicing martial artist is photographed in mid leap slicing through bamboo with his sword.
A martial artist is practicing with a sword against a stick of bamboo.
A man in black pants and a white shirt chopping bamboo with a sword.
A man in a martial arts uniform in midair.
A young man is in practice.
Sports team on a field wearing yellow jerseys with a goal net to the right.
Soccer players are meandering over the playing field.
Players in yellow jerseys are on the field.
Two diverse teams competing in soccer.
Two soccer teams are on the field.
A person in a yellow top and green shorts stands in a field by a soccer goal.
A soccer player in a yellow jersey is standing alone on the field.
A female soccer player in a yellow uniform in a soccer field.
A goalie in a yellow field is protecting the goal.
A goalie looks down-field.
A group of young people take shots in a Mexican setting.
A group of people at a restaurant about to take shots.
Young people in sombreros enjoy shots and drinks.
A group of people taking shots at a restaurant.
People wearing sombreros drink shots happily.
The boy in the yellow shirt is riding a skateboard along a red bar.
A teenage boy grinds across a bar on his skateboard.
A boy performs a trick on his skateboard on a rail.
A young man skateboards off a pink railing.
A skateboarder grinds a red rail.
Two odd statue like costumes are being worn in a street, they are surrounded by others at what appears to be a festival.
Two towers made of flashy fabric with weird heads on top of them are facing each other on a roadway.
Two people wearing odd alien-like costumes, one blue and one purple, are standing in a road.
2 people in blue and purple costumes are looking at each other with a hill in the background.
Two people dressed as aliens encounter each other on a street.
A man jogging with his two thumbs up in the air, while making a funny face.
A male runner with a number pinned to his shorts gives the thumbs-up.
A man that appears to be running in a marathon gives us 2 thumbs up.
A man giving two thumbs up as he runs a race.
A man gives a thumbs up sign during his race.
The man on the yellow basketball team tries to score while the men on the opposing team try to block his shot.
In this picture all men from both basketball teams with red and green jerseys are jumping.
A group of basketball players wearing yellow and green reach for a ball.
Basketball players shoot for a goal during a game.
Four men jumping in a basketball game
A football player wearing an orange uniform smiling and holding the football.
A man in an orange jersey with the letter "12" on it plays football.
A football player wearing an orange jersey holding a football
Number 12 in orange gets ready to throw the football.
A University of Miami player holds a football.
A football game is going on, with player on the field, squatting on the sidelines and standing, watching the game.
A team in white and gold on the sidelines of a football field.
Fans of a football team look out onto the field.
A football coach and his team on the sidelines.
Everyone is getting ready to play the game.
A little girl with a brown shirt, blue jeans, and brown hair is playing outside with her pink scooter in a yard with lots of trees.
A small girl with short brown hair is pushing a pink scooter over grass with brown leaves with threes in the background
A girl is in a field surrounded by trees and pushing a pink scooter on the grass.
A little girl is pushing her scooter through a grassy tree lined field.
A little girl is walking her bike a lawn.
Group of asian children dressed in white shirts and hats performing with a crowd looking on.
A bunch of children in white are doing a dance routine while another person jumps rope.
A small child jumping rope as other children clap their hands over their heads nearby.
A crowd of children in white shirts, black shorts and white hats jumping rope.
Several children are all engaging in excersise
Two people are looking at a child as one of them is pushing a wheelchair on the sidewalk.
A child plays in a box on the side of the street, as people look on and smile.
Two people are walking past a girl who is in a card board box on a sidewalk.
Pedestrians walking down the street look at a child in a cardboard box.
Small child is hanging out of a box on the sidewalk.
Two men in the US Army are in uniform and talking with another woman, who is wearing a black sweater with a purse inside of what looks like a conference room.
A soldier talks with a colleague with his wife beside him.
A woman with long hair is talking to two men in uniform.
Two army soldiers and a woman talking in an office.
Two men in army uniforms stand next to a woman.
A man walks over a small sign carrying his bicycle.
A man is jumping over a low wall holding a bicycle.
The biker carries his bike over the obstacle.
Man carries bike over obstacle
A biker jumps an obstacle.
A boy and girl ride in the front of a small train labeled "Mississippi Train".
A group of adults and children are riding on a train ride.
A bunch of kids are riding on a little train.
Children on a train, at an amusement park.
Young kids are on a small train ride.
A man in a blue wetsuit rides a wave on a white surfboard.
A surfer tries to stay moving on his white surfboard.
A surfer in a blue swimsuit is riding the waves.
A man in a blue bodysuit surfing.
A man in blue surfs in the ocean.
A man in a white sports uniform tries to fend off another player in a black and yellow uniform while the ball floats in midair.
Two young men on opposing soccer teams are competing to get the ball on a soccer field.
Two soccer opponents run and fight for the soocerball on a grassy field.
Two soccer players battle for the ball during an intense match.
Two soccer players are going after the ball.
The little boy jumps through the beaded curtain and onto the bed.
A shirtless boy jumps through a curtain onto a red cushion.
A young boy wearing white pants is jumping off the couch.
A boy jumps through the air onto something red.
A child holds its arm up and laughs.
Two men and a woman pose with signs for Obama and Chris Gregoire.
Three people pose with their political signs out in public.
Three democrat supporters hold signs for an election.
Three people smiling and holding political signs.
Three people with political signs.
An officer stands next to a car on a city street.
A cop stands in front of a car on a busy street.
A police officer is lighting a cigarette.
A policeman stands in front of an SUV.
A man walks in the city.
A couple of men in hats posing for a picture by a gas station.
Two men wearing hats stand together and smile.
Two men in hats pose together.
Two guys wearing jackets.
Two men wearing hats.
A boy in a stripy shirt is playing with a soccer ball in a grassy park in front of some bushes.
Boy leaning backward to kick a soccer ball in midair.
A boy leaping in the air towards a soccer ball.
A child falling back to kick a soccer ball.
A boy in midair trying to kick a soccer ball
A red-haired man with dreadlocks is sitting playing and acoustic guitar.
A man with short dreads, and solemn expression, playing guitar.
A redheaded man with a beard and glasses is playing the guitar.
A man sits while playing the guitar.
A man is sitting playing guitar.
A man in sunglasses is eating and holding a baby wearing a white bucket hat.
A man in sunglasses is eating something while he has a girl on his lap.
A man eating a sandwich with his baby daughter in his lap.
A man eating and holding a baby with a white hat on.
Man eats while holding a baby
A little boy with a black jacket and black jeans on is holding up a blue brochure for the camera.
An African American child is holding something up that those in the picture are proud of.
A small black child is holding up a poster among many other children.
A boy is holding up a paper with a crowd of people around him.
A room full of people with a black kid showing a piece of art.
A woman in a white shirt and hat speaks to a large crowd of men and women using a megaphone.
Someone in a white shirt yelling through a mega phone to a crowd of people.
Many people stand in a line while a person in white talks on a megaphone.
A woman directs a crowd of people with a loudspeaker.
Africans at an organized event.
This is a large group of young people at a party.
A group of young people dance at a club.
A bunch of people are in a club dancing.
A crowd is present at a bar.
An event with young adults.
A man in a t-shirt is standing with his hands on some type of instrument with a lot of buttons on it, with fake fog in the background.
A man with dark hair and brown skin is in a dark room with his hands on some equipment.
A DJ in a club, adjusting levels on his mixing board.
A man is using electronic equipment.
A man uses stereo equipment.
A young man with a red handkerchief over his face is the main focus, while people wearing protective security armor are in the background.
A person in a white t-shirt, military print cap and red bandanna with a skeleton on it covering most of the person's face.
Riot police are standing in the background while a young man with a red scarf covering his face is walking.
A man with a red bandanna over his face looks on as police stand in the background wearing riot gear.
Masked protester surrounded by the police.
A woman in white in front of a window, while reading a book on the couch.
A lady sitting on the couch in front of a large set of windows reading.
A woman sitting on her couch, by the front windows, reading a book.
A woman wearing a sweater is reading a book in her home.
Woman reading letters in great window light.
A man in jeans and a white shirt is standing near a rock formation with his back to the camera.
A man wearing a white shirt and jeans attempts to climb a rock.
A man is climbing a cliff with his feet on a brown metal plate
The man in the white t-shirt is starting to climb a rock.
A man grips the underhang of a rock.
A woman holding a red cup with a straw in it sits in front of a man and a woman looking at a book.
A woman holds a drink while a man and a woman examine a book.
A man and a woman read a book while their friend has a drink.
Two women and a man are looking at a book.
Three people are gathered for a picture.
You can see the bottom halves of three boys standing on a sidewalk with silly string sprayed everywhere
There are three people in jeans and shirts standing outside with spray cans.
Three children's legs are shown as they stand near a mess of silly string.
Three people standing near a door, with silly string cans.
Three kids play with silly string.
A man with a smile on his face put the chicken on the basin full of chicken
A man holding a chicken while he wears a mischievous grin on his face.
A restaurant cook getting ready to prepare a chicken to cook
A cook is posing for a camera while cooking.
The chef is trying to debone a chicken.
A bike rider is airborne with a daytime sky in the background.
The man is performing a trick with a bicycle high in the air.
The teen jumps the hill with his bicycle.
A bmx rider gets a lot of air.
A male airborne on a bicycle.
A little girl barefoot, wearing a white shirt and brown skirt runs along the sandy shoreline.
A little girl running at on the shore of a beach.
A little dark-haired girl runs on the beach.
A young child is running along a beach.
A young girl running on the beach.
A man dressed in black shorts, a black t-shirt, and a backwards black baseball cap is talking to a man wearing a striped shirt and shorts while standing behind a truck.
Two males seem to be conversing while standing in front of a truck's back, and behind a metal item, while four people stand around them.
A semi trailer is inside a building, and people are gathered behind its open rear door where there are displays being set up.
A group of people are standing in a warehouse.
People stand in a warehouse.
An ice hockey goalkeeper wearing yellow is defending the goal.
A hockey player in a yellow jersey is guarding the goal.
A goalie stands in front of the goal at a hockey game.
The goaltender is crouching in front of the goal.
A hockey player guards the goal.
An African-American male wearing black shoes carrying a black bag walks along a yellow wall with the words "E.S.E. Electronics" painted on it.
An African American man is posing in front of an E.S.E. Electronics advertisement billboard after purchasing items from the local liquor store.
A man carrying a bag gesticulates at the photographer while walking in front of a large advertisement.
A man is walking past a large sign that says E.S.E. Electronics.
A man carrying a bag walks past an electronics sign.
Three boys wearing green shirts and tan pants pose at the top of a slide.
Three boys in green shirts and khaki pants are at the top of a slide.
Three boys all wearing green shirts are climbing on a slide.
Three children are posing on a playground slide.
Three boys climb on a slide
Circus performer gesturing upward while hold a dog between his legs, with a man and two goats in the background.
An entertainer stand on one leg, holding up a dog as two goats stand on pedestals in the background.
A man is dressed in a costume in front of several goats.
A man is dancing with a dog between his legs.
A dog tamer creates human jumping ring.
The white dog is running in the shallow water.
A wet dog is splashing through shallow water.
The wet brown dog is running in the water.
A brown dog running through the water.
Wet blond dog running through water
The girl in the light pink shirt is playing a game with the other children.
A group of children play together in a fenced yard as an adult watches.
A group of children playing in a yard, a man in the background.
The children are playing outdoors, while a man smiles nearby.
Some kids play in a field.
A little girl in a purple plaid dress lays on the floor and cries with her toy beside her.
A little girl in a purple plaid dress is lying on the floor crying.
A young girl in a purple dress throws a tantrum.
A girl in a purple dress is throwing a tantrum.
A girl in a purple dress crying on the floor.
A gray headed guy standing in his bathroom shaving his face and neck.
A man with a pensive look on his face shave off his beard.
A unclothed man with gray hair is shaving his face.
A man with graying hair shaves his beard.
A man shaving his gray beard.
A basketball player leaps with the ball while opponents try to block him.
A pro basketball player in a white Miami uniform makes a defensive move.
Basketball players try to block a ball from going into the goal.
Man in a Miami basketball uniform jumping to make a shot.
The basketball player is number 21 from Miami.
The lone man in red sits outside of his blue door and windowed house contemplating about his thought.
A woman is sitting outside her house with a blue door, enjoying the air.
An old black man sitting in front of a white and blue shack.
A person is sitting on a chair next to a very small house.
A man in a pink shirt sitting next to a small building.
Several older men, some in traditional headdress convene on a street corner.
Six men outside are passing each other by while looking at each other.
Several men standing near a black concrete wall.
A group of men standing on the street.
Old men stand on the street.
Player in blue and white uniform and player in gold and black uniform going after soccer ball.
The soccer player wearing the gold jersey is blocking the ball from the opposing team player.
Three men playing professional soccer while many people in the stands watching
Yellow team and Blue team racing to the soccer ball.
A group of soccer players are playing soccer.
A man dressed mainly in black is holding a huge triangular guitar-like instrument with a musical stand in front of him.
A man in a black windbreaker strumming on a large stringed instrument on the sidewalk in front of a building.
Man wearing black playing a very large guitar-like instrument.
Man plays a strange looking string instrument.
A person is playing an unique instrument.
A girl wearing black athletic clothing with the number 1102 on her jersey runs across some grass.
A woman wearing a black athletic uniform has the number 1102 on her and she is running.
A female soccer player dressed in black.
Women running on a soccer field.
A girl in black runs a race.
Person in a racing ski outfit and a helmet is skiing while in a squat position.
A person playing sports in the snow is crouched down.
A kid crosscountry skis wearing the number "93".
A snow skier is going down a slalom course.
The skier is on the snow.
Two children climb an indoor rock walk as two other children are on belay.
Two children are climbing a rock wall while two others look on.
Two children climb a rock wall as two people watch carefully.
Two young children scaling a wall with harnesses on.
Kids scale a wall as two other people watch.
The girl with the red belt is kicking a pad that the person in black is holding.
A girl in martial arts class is kicking a dummy.
Little girl kicks black object at karate class.
A young girl in martial arts class kicks a bag.
Kid practicing karate move
A professionally dressed woman standing at a podium debating or discussing something of importance.
A woman in a tan suit and red shirt speaks into microphones at a podium.
A woman with long curly hair is standing at a podium and speaking.
The woman in the tan suit is speaking at the pedestal.
A lovely woman makes a point at a business meeting.
A drunken woman in a blue dress, black tights, and black leather pumps, laying on a couch, smoking a cigarette, laughing.
A drunken woman laughs as she lays on a small cough.
A laughing woman is sitting on a patterned couch.
A woman is laying down on a sofa laughing.
A lady is laying on a brown plaid couch.
Doe jumps over wood and wire fence
A deer is jumping over a fence.
A deer jumping over a fence.
A dear jumps the fence.
A deer jumps a fence.
A toddler boy in a sailor suit and a little girl run in the sand.
Two small children walk down a sandy beach.
Two kids run through gray sand.
Two young children are on sand.
Two smiling kids walking on sand
A man is standing in front of a brick storefront wearing a black jacket.
Young man with cap and buttoned coat stands before building.
Young man in warm coat outside storefront.
The man is in front of a building
A man standing on a city street.
Four birds are chasing another bird which has a piece of food in its mouth
A seagull flies under another with food while three others follow.
A flock of birds fly away with food in their beaks.
Seagulls fighting over a scrap of bread.
Several birds flying in front of trees.
A girl making a snow angel, wearing a black hat and glasses.
An Asian girl in glasses is laying in a deep pit of snow.
Young girl enjoying herself as she makes a snow angel.
A lady is lying in the snow making a snow angel.
An Asian woman is making a snow angel.
Three guys smiling for camera and showing off their muscles.
Three men making happy gestures posing for a photograph
3 guys ham it up in front of the camera.
Three men are cheering in kitchen.
Three men smiling and gesturing.
A man in a black shirt next to a laptop and in front of a screen is looking off to the side.
A man in a black shirt sits beneath a 'no child left behind' powerpoint presentation.
A man in a black shirt sitting at a table with an open Apple laptop in front of him.
A man either giving or viewing a powerpoint presentation.
A businessman giving a powerpoint presentation.
A group of traveling people relaxing on top of a hill overlooking a range.
Four people relaxing on a grassy hill overlooking a rocky valley.
A man and three women with backpacks, sitting on a mountain.
A group of people rest on a cliff overlooking a scenic view.
Four people are sitting at the top of a hill.
A young boy is quite excited in the throes of a ballgame.
A little boy is running excitedly in a mountainous area.
A little boy in a striped shirt and jeans is running.
What is this ecstatic child running towards?
The boy is outside enjoying a summer day.
A worker in an orange work suit is kneeling down inspecting a piece of machinery.
A man in heavy clothing with a cart of tools bending to inspect the floor
A guy bending over checking under some stage lights.
A man in orange working under dim lighting.
A man working on a machine.
Lady with short brown hair and a red and white striped shirt with a name tag taking a sip from a cup.
The woman in the striped shirt is sipping a beverage while at work.
A woman in a red and white striped turtleneck sipping from a cup.
A restaurant worker takes a sip of coffee in the kitchen.
An employee takes a break from working to have a drink
A man is guiding the hockey puck across the ice while an opposing player races towards it.
Two hockey players wearing yellow and black uniforms skate on the ice.
Two people in hockey uniforms on the ice.
Hockey player in white uniform with stick
Two ice hockey players
A man with a white shirt with his mouth open wide and turning buttons.
Man in a white shirt with a gold watch playing with a circuit board.
A man in a white shirt has his mouth open and is adjusting dials.
A man wearing a white t-shirt has his mouth open wide.
A man controls a large equipment board.
A brown dog is looking at a black horse that is sticking its head through a fence.
A black horse stands in the grass at a fence, while a brown dog looks on.
A black horse sticking its head through a fence trying to reach the grass.
A brown dog is looking at the black horse on the other side of the gate.
A horse and dog look at each other in a field.
An apparently homeless black man with mismatched shoes, two pairs of pants, and a heavy jacket tries to warm his hands while sitting on a door step.
A crackhead is pretending to keep his hands warm but actually he is smoking crack.
An homeless man is rubbing his hands together trying to keep warm.
A man with mismatched shoes sits in front of an entrance.
He is smoking looking at the person.
A smiling woman in a brown shirt leans on a man in a sweater.
Man with brown hair and a woman with blond-hair smile.
A woman in brown and a man in gray look at the camera.
A couple posing together each smiling
Two guys and a girl smiling.
A black and white dog is playing with an orange ball in the snow.
The little black and white dog is in the snow with a red ball.
A black-and-white dog goes for a flattened ball on the snow.
A black dog is chasing a punctured ball in the snow.
A dog getting a ball in the snow
A young girl standing next to a yellow cat on a kitchen countertop.
A girl reaches up to kiss a cat, which is sitting on the counter.
Little girl in kitchen, kissing a fluffy orange cat.
A small child kissing a cat on the kitchen counter.
The little girl is kissing the brown cat.
The boy is wearing a blue shirt, and the girl is wearing black clothes.
A young boy wearing a blue shirt is playing at a park.
The boy and girl are playing on the outdoor gym.
The two kids are playing at the playground.
Children playing on a playground.
The boy wearing red shorts is jumping into the river as other children swim.
The boy in the red shorts jumps into the water to join other people.
A boy in a red swimsuit jumps into the water to join two people.
A boy takes a flying leap into the water.
A boy in a red suit plays in the water.
A child wearing a red coat and cap is holding a large chunk of snow.
The boy in the red hat and jacket is carrying a huge lump of snow.
A boy in a red coat holds a huge ball of snow.
A boy carrying a chunk of snow.
A child outside with snow.
Two older men are having a discussion outdoors in an area with stone walls and floor.
Two men sit casually in folding chairs, gesturing, and speaking to one another.
Two man sit and chat on a stone lanai surrounded by plants.
Two men sit talking near a stone building.
Two old men having a conversation.
A couple embrace and kiss on the sidewalk in front of a parked limo as a pedestrian walks by them.
Two people are kissing on a sidewalk in front of a limo while people walk by.
A couple kissing in front of a black Mercedes Benz limousine
Man and woman kissing on sidewalk next to a parked car.
A high class woman kissing a man.
A female volleyball player wearing a bikini jumps and spikes the ball.
A skinny woman spikes a volleyball over the net.
A woman playing volleyball at the beach.
A woman is playing volleyball.
A woman plays volleyball.
The brown dog is jumping a hurdle over a yellow and black pole.
A brown dog jumping over a blue and yellow stick.
A dog jumps over a hurdle at a competition.
A brown dog jumps over an obstacle.
A brown dog jumping over a hurdle.
A very young child is sitting behind an even younger child with her hands around him.
A little girl holds a toddler while sitting on backyard trampoline.
A young blond girl holds a smaller blond boy in her lap outdoors.
A girl in pink is holding onto a young boy wearing red.
A little girl is holding a little boy on her lap.
Man falling off of a bucking bull, at a rodeo, in front of spectators.
A man trying to ride a very mad bull on a beautiful Saturday afternoon.
A cowboy is bucked off a steer while other men watch from the stands.
People at a rodeo are watching a cowboy getting thrown from the bull.
A man is about to fall onto the ground while he rodeos.
There is a person in a green shirt riding a bike at an extreme angle in a rural area.
A cyclist is leaning a mountain bike around a bend on a dirt track.
A person riding a bike sideways through a dirt path.
A man in a green shirt rides a bike in the woods.
A blurred picture on a bicyclist.
An Indian boy looks at a black cow whilst a woman in a blue and green sari looks away.
Two women in colorful clothes sit on the ground near their cow.
Two East Asian women sitting outdoors behind a cow-like animal
Two women in India, sitting near an ox.
Two people and a leashed cow at a home.
A man is helping a little boy learn how to ride a bicycle.
The young boy learns how to ride a bike with his dad.
The man helps the boy ride a bike.
A man helping a boy ride a bike.
A man helps a boy ride a bike.
A small boy in a red shirt and black shorts pushing a broom outside a house on the driveway next to a toy basketball hoop.
A little boy in a red shirt is sweeping the floor on a porch.
A kid is holding a broom and sweeping his property.
Boy in red shirt and black shorts sweeps driveway.
A child is sweeping outside of a building.
Woman in a white and gold shirt holding a baby and with three children and a man in a jacket.
An african family are standing in front of some makeshift houses.
A black mother and five children in a rural area
Family standing in a small village.
A family in the desert.
A shot haired woman in a white shirt giving a long-haired woman in a red shirt a manicure.
Two women are holding hands over a table and smiling at the camera.
Two women sitting at a table with their hands together.
Two women are smiling while sitting at the table.
Two women are sitting at a table.
A young woman with dark hair and a slight smile receives a check on behalf of Kids' Food Basket for $ 37,000.
A woman is holding an over sized check for $ 37,000 for the Kids Food Basket.
A white woman holding a donation check for "Kids Food Basket."
A woman tears up over a huge donation to the Kids Food Basket.
A woman is holding a large check for Kids Food Basket.
The two dogs, one with a tennis ball in its mouth, are running through tall grass.
One white dog is running with a tennis ball in his mouth while another dog jogs along
Two dogs walking through grass with the white one carrying a yellow ball in mouth.
Two dogs, one holding a ball.
Two dogs playing with a ball.
A man has his face in his hand and is sitting on a bench.
Man in white shirts and khaki pants rests head in hand.
Man holds his face in his palm sitting on a bench.
A man listening to music on a park bench.
A man sits on a bench listing to his iPod
A man with a blue shirt and gray apron cuts fish at an outdoor market.
A man in a blue shirt and apron prepares food.
An older man in glasses is preparing meat.
A man wearing apron is slicing a meat.
A butcher is cutting some meat.
A man wearing red and black is balancing himself on the back wheels of a bicycle that is pointing up.
A man performing a trick on a bicycle by standing on the pedals while the bike is upright.
A man demonstrates how to ride a bicycle with only the back wheel on the ground.
Man in a red shirt riding a trick bicycle on only the rear wheel.
A man in a red outfit balances on a bike.
Men and women sitting and walking around picnic tables and having food.
A group of people sitting at a picnic table eating.
Multiple people in a park eating at a picnic table
People enjoying cookout food in a public park.
Several people are eating lots of food.
Two women, one wearing a purple shirt and the other a green shirt, are climbing their way up an electrical pole with safety equipment with onlookers.
A woman in a purple shirt and a woman wearing a hard hat are attached by harnesses to a pole.
Two women ascend a telephone pole with special boots and straps on their waists.
Two women, one wearing a purple shirt, attempt to climb a utility pole.
Two women are strapped to a tree in some type of construction job.
Three women in bright colors and headdresses are holding love message cards.
Three women in costume are holding papers that say "I love you".
Girls in bright costumes holding little signs that say Iove you.
Three women in elaborate costumes hold up "I Love You" cards.
Three women in colorful costumes holding I love you signs.
A brown dog with a brown collar digging in the sand
A brown dog with a brown collar digs sand.
A brown dog is digging in the dirt.
A dog is digging a hole in the dirt
A brown dog digs in the sand.
Young boy in a white striped shirt and headband holding a tennis racket.
There is a little boy ready to hit the tennis ball, holding a racquet.
Little boy playing tennis with a black and yellow racket.
A little boy in a striped polo shirt plays tennis.
A young boy is holding a tennis racket.
A little girl jumping into the stream of water on a hot day.
A girl is playing in the fountain fully clothed.
A little girl is getting splashed by water.
A child is playing in water.
A child splashes in water.
Three young sumo wrestler students stand at attention at an award ceremony in front of a man at the microphone.
Young sumo wrestlers stand before a man reading from an official-looking document.
A man is presenting a certificate to three young sumo wrestlers.
Three young sumo wrestlers standing and listening to an announcer
A sumo wrestler accepting an award.
A hiker is squatting on the ground looking at a tree stump while his companion stands nearby holding a walking stick.
Two male hikers inspect a log by the side of a forest path.
Some nature hikers stop to examine a log along the path.
Two men are in the woods one is looking at a log.
Two gentlemen outside beside a log.
A woman in a blue shirt is walking across the street of an older looking district.
Two boys cross a city street while kicking a red soccer ball.
Two boys crossing a street with a red ball.
2 males walking about on a street corner.
Two boys playing ball in the street.
A man in midair with his back touching that of another man hunched over
A black man leans over as a white man jumps on his back backwards.
One man in a hat flips over another man back in the grass.
A man holding up another with his back.
Two people play outdoors.
The winners 1st, 2nd, and 3rd of a event posing for a picture each holding flowers.
The men who won first, second, and third place of a bicycle race.
3 Olympic winners posing for a photo on an advertised background
Three athletes holding bouquets stand on the victory podium.
Three men accepting an award.
A young girl in a baby pink outfit poses for the camera while holding onto a jungle gym in a playground.
Little girl dressed in pink playing on a playground.
A little girl wearing pink is holding on to a bar.
A young girl hanging onto playground equipment.
A young girl playing on a blue playground.
A motorcyclist dressed in green with a green motorcycle is jumping over a row of green motorcycles
A motorcyclist wearing a green shirt on a green bike jumping over a row of other green bikes.
A green motorcycle is being jumped over a line of ten green motorcycles.
A man riding a green motorcycle jumping nine other green motorcycles.
A man in green jumps serveral motorbikes on his own motorbike.
A woman is playing with two children on a seesaw in a playground.
A woman playing with two young boys at a park
A woman and three kids play at a park.
Woman on four way seesaw with 2 kids.
A woman and three children.
Two teenage girls hugging, one wearing a bicycle helmet, with cyclists in the background.
A blond girl in white has her arms around a girl in a helmet.
The girl is hugging another girl with a helmet.
A girl cyclist being hugged by another girl.
Two girls hugging.
A woman holds her little white dog and points to a big brown dog at the bottom of the hill.
A woman is standing in a green field holding a white dog and pointing at a brown dog.
A lady holding one dog while another dog is playing in the yard.
A woman holds a dog while another dog stands nearby in a field.
A woman holding a white dog points at a brown dog in the grass.
Standing outside in front of a red van, a man in a hat picks up a framed painting from a table full of such paintings and other art.
A man in a straw hat and white shirt at an outdoor art gallery
A table full of pictures in frames, at an outdoor market.
A street vendor is displaying artwork and other goods.
A man in straw hat is looking at pictures on a table.
Two people sit at a table outside against a wall and make faces.
A man and a woman sitting on each side of a small metal table.
A man and a woman are sitting at a small metal table.
Two older people sit at an outdoor cafe table.
Two older people drinking coffee outside.
Man walking away from building with large tunnel-like entrance holding a drink and a man going into the entrance.
A young man holding a cup, standing in front of an archway to an old stone building.
Man in shorts and t-shirt walking and holding a drink in front of an archway.
A man in a white shirt walking in front of an old building.
A guy in a white shirt is walking with a drink in his hand.
Two people are silhouetted against a lake reflecting a painted sky.
A boy and a girl are standing on the edge of a lake at sunset.
Two people silhouetted against a lake at sunset.
Two figures are walking by a pond.
Two children are walking by a pond
A man in a green t-shirts holds his sneakers while walking alone down a beach.
A man in a green t-shirt walks down a beach, carrying his tennis shoes.
A man in a green shirt is walking on the beach carrying his sneakers.
A man in green walking down the beach while holding his shoes.
Man in a green shirt holding his shoes walking on the sand.
A drag race car being worked on by 3 people on a track
Three men are examining a red and white race car.
Three men standing around a car on a racetrack.
Several men standing around an antique race car
Pit crew working on a race car.
Three girls wearing goggles are jumping into a swimming pool together.
Children jumping in a pool surrounded by pool chairs and huts.
A woman and three children are jumping into a swimming pool.
Children jump off the edge into a pool.
Three girls jump into a pool.
A woman in a striped shirt and sunglasses is sitting on a bike.
A girl with a striped shirt is sitting on a bicycle.
A woman on a bicycle stops for a moment to converse.
A woman in a striped-tunic on a bicycle.
A woman in a striped outfit on a bike.
A woman is propping her leg up revealing cleavage, a great tatoo, and some kicking boots.
A woman in black leggings and beige cowboy boots.
A girl dressed in black is posing for the camera.
A woman in black clothes with one leg up.
A woman dressed in black.
Four different men sitting outside on cement steps in front of a building.
Four men are sitting on the stoop of a stone church.
Four black men are sitting on the steps of a church.
Some men sitting on the steps of a church.
Four men sit on a church's steps.
A bulldozer works to demolish a decrepit building; in the background, another brick building waits for its demise, its face covered with a grid of blackened window-holes.
A yellow construction vehicle is posed near two buildings, its arm engaged with a pile of rubble.
A damaged building has a an excavator in front of it.
A crane operates amidst piles of rubble.
A building is getting demolished.
A woman on the uneven bars doing a gymnastics exercise while people are watch her out of focus.
A gymnast wearing red and white is mid-twirl on an uneven bar.
A female gymnast holds herself vertically above uneven bars.
Gymnast doing handstand on a pole
An gymnast is working the bar.
Two middle-aged Asian men with mustaches working with animal hides in a shop.
Two men are crafting items in a workshop with tools.
Two men working in a small factory.
Two men are working in a shop.
Two men are busy working.
An older woman looks at the camera while young children play with many kinds of toys around the room in the background.
A woman in a child's classroom is helping a child build a sculpture, while other children play by themselves.
A middle-aged woman wearing a white shirt talking as she shows a small child in yellow how the toys work.
A teacher in white and a little girl wearing a yellow dress playing with building block.
A woman is helping a child build using toys.
A little girl is sleeping with a book on her chest next to a doll.
A blond child sleeps with her book open and resting on her chest.
A young child sleeping in her bed with an open book on her chest.
A young female child asleep with a book laying over her chest.
A little girl is sleeping with a book.
A woman with a blue shirt is putting something in her mouth.
Two women are eating seated on the grass with hiking gear.
A woman is getting ready to eat on the side of a road.
A woman eating in the grass on a beautiful day.
A woman in a blue shirt in the wild.
A person dressed in brown and gray walks down a long street lined with yellow-walled buildings with tiled roofs.
A man walks down a cobblestone street next to buildings painted tan with red eaves.
A man walks down an alley between cream colored houses.
A man is walking down a narrow street.
Man in black walking up a sidewalk.
A woman pounding something with a rock, with a guinea pig in the background.
Women grinding grain on stone with guinea pig in background.
A woman wearing a black hat grinds flour using two stones.
Native woman being constructive with her hands.
A woman wearing a hat with making bread.
An African woman in long, flowing garb, with a baby on her back, is working in a dry field with trees far off in the distance.
A solitary woman uses a large primitive mortar and pestle to crush plant material as she stands in a stubble field.
A black woman with a child on her back is standing in a field holding onto a pole.
One African American woman working in a field with a baby in a sling.
A black woman works in a field.
Young male in a white karate outfit with a blue belt wrapped around his waist performs karate moves in front of the judges of the competition.
A martial artist wearing white uniform with a blue belt in a defensive pose.
A man in a martial arts outfit with a blue belt is practicing martial arts.
A man in a karate is performing in front of two judges.
A man practices a martial arts pose.
Blond man crossing street, in white shirt and red t-shirt, carrying a white bag.
A man in a blue-collared shirt is seen watching a man at his cart in the evening.
A man in formal attire plays a piano on the sidewalk of a city street.
A man dressed in Victorian-era clothing plays a piano in the street.
Person standing with a cart on wheels in front of a brick building.
An elderly man dressed in a red and blue plaid shirt and brown camouflage cap is watching an event while eating a snack from a plastic bag on his lap.
An older gentleman, in a red plaid shirt and hunting cap, eats a piece of food from his bag.
An elderly man with a camouflage hat and plaid jacket sitting in a chair.
An elderly man sitting in a chair, eating some snacks.
An older man in a flannel shirt, sitting down.
A woman in a white shirt stands behind a counter, in the kitchen of an empty restaurant with brick walls.
A woman stands behind the counter in the open kitchen of a restaurant.
A woman in a white shirt works behind the counter at a cafe.
A young woman in white working in a professional kitchen.
A woman in a white blouse is working in a restaurant.
A worker in a safety vest and hat is unloading equipment from the back of a truck.
A technician in an orange vest and a hard hat removes cables from a work truck.
A man dressed in a reflective vest is pulling cabling out of a truck.
A man with work clothes on standing on the back of a truck.
The electrical worker in the back of his work truck.
A woman in a pink overcoat is looking surprised while talking to someone in a purple coat, on the streets in front of Vitamin Shoppe.
A woman wearing a bright pink overcoat makes a face to a woman wearing a purple overcoat while standing outside a Vitamin Shoppe.
There is a lady in a pink coat standing on street with a comical surprised look on her face.
Woman with a surprised face in front of a Vitamin Shoppe
Two women having a conversation in a city area.
A red vehicle is being reflected in a store window while two casually dressed middle-aged men walk and converse.
A man in a yellow shirt and a man in a dark blue shirt talking.
Two older men are standing outside talking.
A guy explains something to his friend.
Two men converse along the sidewalk.
Two children and a woman are sitting on a sofa, one of the children has a camera.
Three Asian children sitting on a couch with tapestries hanging in the background.
An Asian woman and her two children sit at a table doing crafts.
A woman in a red shirt sitting with two young girls in dresses.
Three young girls in arts and crafts room.
A woman in a red shirt and white skirt playing tennis with a blue racket.
Young female tennis player in a red shirt hitting the ball.
A woman is jumping as she attempts to hit a tennis ball.
A girl in a red shirt jumps up to hit a tennis ball.
A girl in a red shirt is playing tennis.
A man in a black jacket and pants stands in a strange green structure with his arms out.
A man is standing with his hands out to his side inside of a green sculpture.
A man stands with his arms out inside a large green piece of equipment.
A man posing the camera with green crane.
A man standing in a green box.
A man smiles, while clinking ale bottles, with an unseen person, at a public establishment.
A man clinks bottles with another person while smiling in a restaurant.
Two friends happily cheer each other at a restaurant.
A man share a Carlsberg toast with someone.
Man cheering a friend with beers.
A man playing an acoustic guitar and singing with a group of people behind him including a woman who is singing along.
A gray-haired man singing in a crowd and playing an acoustic guitar.
A man in a black jacket plays the guitar out in public.
A man in a dark jacket is playing an instrument.
A man in a black jacket playing the guitar.
A number of people are doing a synchronized martial arts performance in the street.
The crowd along the city street is watch performers with long wood poles.
A group of men in white shirts perform in a parade.
Martial artist with rods performing in a parade.
A dance group performs in a parade in china.
A person with a backpack stands on a rocky bank beside a body of water.
Person standing on rocky edge of water with hilly land in background.
A person is standing on jagged rocks above the water below.
A man stands on a rocky cliff overlooking a body of water.
A man stands alone on the rocks.
Two people with their hands expressively out towards a sporting event's field.
A man and lady are watching and cheering at a soccer game.
A man and woman watching a sports event in a stadium.
Two men in blue shirts looking at a soccer game.
Two fans are cheering at a sporting event.
A woman with long hair is meditating on a beach.
There's a young lady in the beach doing yoga.
A young lady doing yoga on the beach.
A woman is doing yoga at the beach.
Woman doing yoga on a beach.
Two men are barbecuing their food while another prepares the meat.
A few guys outside grilling some food at night.
A man grilling meat on an outdoor grilling pit.
Men tend meat at the makeshift barbecue.
Two men are cooking meat on the grill.
A lady in a bikini is pouring a drink into a red cup for a man who is wearing trunks and sunglasses.
Brunette woman in a white bikini pouring a drink into a man's cup.
A woman is standing in a bikini serving a man a drink.
A woman in a bikini is pouring a drink for a man.
A woman in a bikini pours a drink for a man.
A group of people run a race or marathon while a crowd of people watch.
People look on as participants in a marathon pass by.
Marathon runners are cheered on by thousands.
People watching marathon runners.
Several people watching a race.
There are two men and one female sitting down and looking at their laptops in front of a window.
Three people at with their backs to the camera at an internet bar.
Three people are sitting at a counter using laptop computers.
Three people work on their laptops inside a store.
People on laptops in front pf a large window.
The man carries ears of corn in his arms while out in the corn field.
A man wearing a harley-davidson hat working in a cornfield.
A man is carrying a load of fruit through his crops.
A man wearing gloves carries corn through a field.
A man harvests a field of fresh corn.
A woman in a pink sweatshirts holds a bouquet of balloons while sitting on a folding chair.
Many people in the crowd look at the stage, some with balloons.
A muslim woman holding balloons at an islamic event
A woman holding a red balloon in a red coat.
A group of people attending an event.
Three young women face each other while sitting on red plush chairs.
Three people on comfortable seating in a waiting room.
A plat is sitting on the floor next to a blond girl.
Three college-age women sit in upholstered chairs.
Three girls talking in a lobby.
A lady walking in a alleyway of what appears to be a third world country.
A woman in a flowered skirt walks along the dirt streets in her village.
A woman wearing blue and red walks through a rustic urban area.
A woman in a blue shirt walking in a village.
Little town and its people on the streets.
A brown dog is shown standing in the water near a muddy beach.
The dog runs through the water with a stick in its mouth.
A dog happily plays in tidal overflow on a cloudy day.
A tan dog playing with a stick on the shore.
A dog is playing in water on a beach.
A young boy in a red shirt is wearing a helmet while sitting on a motorcycle.
A young boy wearing a red jumpsuit smiles while riding a motorbike.
A boy in a helmet and red tracksuit poses on a motorbike.
A child is on a motorcycle smiling.
Young boy on a motorcycle smiling.
People are gathered around the table filled with food.
A family is sitting at a table ready to eat dinner.
6 people are gathered around to eat a big dinner.
A family having a turkey dinner.
A happy family at thanksgiving.
A person, dressed as "Santa Claus", is wearing a red coat and standing in a crowded room of people while a few people take pictures.
A city street filled with people, a person dressed as Santa Clause, and a guy with a bullhorn.
Santa Claus being photographed at a holiday media event.
A man in a Santa suit stands amongst a crowded street.
Man in Santa suit socializes at holiday event.
Group of people outside, holding a banner with blue text on it.
Military Families are marching through New York on a rainy day.
A group of protesters supporting military families.
People at a protest regarding military personnel.
Protesters holding a petition in the rain.
A woman wearing plaid pants rides a motorcycle down the road with a pillow and plant secured to the backseat.
A person in red rides a motorcycle while carrying several items, including a plant.
Person in checkered shirt and red pants riding a motorbike down a road.
A woman in a blue helmet and red pants riding a motorcycle.
A man in red pants is carrying groceries on a motorcycle.
For people in black pants and white martial arts shirts with belts hold a pose with both arms raised while three casually dressed me look on from a door on the left.
Several men are wearing martial arts uniforms while they perform some moves in unison.
Four men doing a martial arts stance in front of onlookers.
People are in a room practicing a martial art.
Karate is not for the light-hearted!
A police officer walking out of his parked vehicle and about the approach a yellow vehicle.
A man in a uniform walking on a street with two cars and a tree.
The partially obscured car is visible to the man in uniform.
A guy who got out of his car with trees around.
A man in uniform is walking by a car.
A girl wearing glasses is in a blue harness while rock climbing.
The woman in glasses is climbing a steep rock wall.
Girl rock climbing on the rock wall.
Young woman climbing rock face
Girl climbing rock wall
A man works on his car as he tries to keep warm with his hat and sweatshirt.
An elderly man in a light blue coat works on a car on the roadside.
Older man in a teal fleece jacket working on a car.
A man in a green jacket is working on his tire.
A man in a green jacket working on a car.
One white man and one african american man sitting at a long table that has colored note cards spread out on it.
People looking over several colored pieces of paper spread on a table.
Several people are sitting at a table looking at colored index cards.
Two men read a bunch of colorful notes laid out on a table.
Business ideas are scattered about a table in a meeting.
Two women in shorts are running on the beach next to the water.
Two girls in shorts and sweaters are running on the beach.
Two women in shorts run down a beach along the water.
Two people in shorts are running on the beach.
Two girls running along the shore.
Three construction workers in orange vests speak to one another in front of railroad tracks.
Three construction workers are standing outside and having a conversation.
Several workmen in safety vests are having a conversation.
Construction workers having a discussion by the tracks.
Workers talk near train tracks.
A man in a puffy black coat stands near a tree trunk while a woman in a white scarf stands next to him with her head slightly bowed.
A view of a pedestrian thoroughfare, featuring a man in a black apron and a white baseball cap standing in the middle of the image.
A man in a white hat and a woman in a light blue jacket have stopped on a busy street to look at something.
People stand and walk on a brick sidewalk wearing jackets and warm clothes.
Man stands on city street beneath pine tree.
A little boy and two older kids are playing on gym equipment in a park with benches and trees.
Three children are at the playground on some slanted bars.
Three young kids enjoying them self at the community park
A group of people are playing on an object.
Children play on a jungle gym.
A young girl in a blue skirt is propping herself up on bars of a metal structure outside.
A little girl in a blue outfit is climbing on metal railings in the street.
A little girl wearing a navy skirt is climbing on some silver poles.
A little girl in navy blue is posing on a railing.
A girl straddles a bike rack on a city street.
A group of five dark-skinned people sitting at what looks to be a farmer's market right behind a fruit that is green and spiky.
There are people sitting around a market area with green fruit in the front drop.
A group of asian sitting and eating in the middle of a market.
A group of men sitting and talking behind some green fruit.
An elderly woman cutting fruit at a market.
An asian long-haired man wearing a yellow hat &amp; long-sleeved shirt talking on a microphone
A guy with a yellow outfit on standing behind a microphone under a tent.
A man dressed in yellow is speaking on the microphone.
A man dressed in yellow speaks into a microphone.
A guy in a yellow hat talking into a microphone.
A guy in all black and boots is kicking in the air with an arid landscape in the background.
It looks like a man practicing his martial arts moves near some muddy looking water.
A young Asian man is jumping in the air, striking a martial arts pose.
Oriental man practicing his karate moves by the ocean.
Karate kick in the desert
A kid in a red and black coat is laying on his back in the snow with his arm in the air and a red sled is next to him.
A child in a red coat waves a hand in the air while lying in snow beside a red plastic sled.
A child lays in the snow next to his sled, raising his hand in the air.
A young boy with a red jacket fell from his sled in the snow.
A child looks bewildered as he lies next to his red sled.
There are several dogs in the field where the girl with the ponytail is sitting down.
A young woman sits crosslegged beside her purse on the grass among a crowd of dogs.
A girl in a gray shirt and brown hair relaxes on the lawn as dogs bound around her.
A woman sitting next to her purse watching dogs at the park.
Woman sitting in the grass with many dogs around her.
A man wearing an orange suit with his face painted white is holding a guitar above his shoulder.
Three men are standing on a stage, one is wearing clown makeup and holding a guitar.
A band performing and entertaining on stage at a Valentine's Day event.
A musical act wearing clown makeup is performing with a guitar.
Various actors perform on a heart shaped stage.
A little girl is standing outside ready to brush the black goat's coat.
Young girl plays with small livestock on farm.
A little girl reaches over to brush a goat.
A young girl is trying to brush a goat.
A small girl is brushing a goat
A blond, fair-skinned baby in a pink top and bib sits in a highchair and eats a biscuit.
A baby girl eats a cookie while seated in a highchair and wearing a bib.
A little girl with blond-hair is eating a cookie in a highchair.
A very young girl is holding food while sitting in a highchair.
A toddler eats a cookie with both hands.
A group of people gather to examine pictures on the wall in a lounge setting.
Woman sitting on chair reading book with many people standing around her.
A student reads a book while others enjoy art photography in a gallery.
A woman reads a book while sitting in a row of red chairs.
An exhibit of artistic black and white photos.
A family is walking on the sidewalk through the snow while a man sits on the side with his paper cup.
A group of people are walking up a street in the winter toward a man who is seated and holding a cup.
A man sits on a fence while a group of people walks on the sidewalk in front of him.
A man is sitting in the snow watching as a group of people are walking by.
A man in blue watches a family walk by while sitting in the snow.
A cat sits atop a sign looking down at the people below.
A cat is sitting atop a sign on the side of a building.
A cat is looking down from on top of a sign.
A cat sits on top of a store sign.
A cat sits upon a business sign.
A male and female are holding hands and - walking down a winding walkway on a sunny day.
Couple walks down a corkscrew walkway above the street.
A couple is walking around an architectural building.
A guy and a girl going down a spiral walkway.
A couple is walking in a building.
A woman sitting on a bench next to someone wearing a hat and sitting in a wheelchair.
An elderly person in a wheelchair next to a girl sitting on a bench.
A woman is sitting on a bench next to a person in a wheelchair.
A woman puts her arm on a person sitting in a wheelchair.
Lady out with a elder person in wheelchair, in the sun.
A lady wearing a headset and a microphone talking on the phone and standing next to a light pole waiting to cross the street.
A woman with a bag, talking on her cellphone, standing on the corner of the street, waiting to cross.
A woman wearing jeans and a blue shirt is standing next to a street post and is holding a white bag.
A woman with a push-to-talk cellphone and headset waiting at a crosswalk.
A lady standing at a crosswalk.
A group of men walk down the middle of a street that has poles lining the street.
A group of people are walking down a road.
People walking down the street in a city.
A group of men walk down a city street.
People walking down A European Street.
Several people walk in and out of a building with a metal globe-like structure outside of it.
A group of people in black standing on a dock nearby a long structure.
The large round sculpture is surrounded by a brick plaza.
A circular piece of architecture is in this city.
A large green metal ball is in a plaza.
An older man dressed in jeans and a puffy dark jacket plays the accordion, seated in front of a stone wall.
Man sitting outside on sidewalk playing music while taking donations.
A middle-aged man is sitting down and playing the accordion.
Pan handler playing the accordion on the sidewalk.
A street musician is playing the accordion.
A teenage girl is dressed up for Saint Patrick's Day and holding her cellphone.
A woman standing around amid other people who are all wearing green.
Girl with green arm band, hair ties, and earrings stands outside.
A woman dressed up in green, probably for St. Patrick's day.
A woman is wearing a green, red, and white shirt.
A small child dressed in a pink jacket running down a sandy beach toward the ocean.
A little girl wearing pink is running along a beach towards the water.
A young girl in a pink shirt is on a beach running toward the ocean.
A young girl fully dresses running on the beach towards the water.
A young girl is running across the beach to get to the water.
A man on a skateboard waits at the corner of a city street, with an overpass in the background.
A young man in a black t-shirt and jeans rides a skateboard on the side of the street.
A young man rides a skateboard down a town road with a yellow railing behind him.
A skateboarder in a black t-shirt and jeans skating threw the city.
A young man is skateboarding down the side of a road.
Players in the red and white uniforms and bystanders are standing on a soccer field.
A group of people stands on the field of a soccer stadium.
A group of people stand, talking at a soccer game.
People on the sideline of a soccer match.
An audience at a soccer game.
A man in a black shirt and white pants swinging a baseball bat, with a baseball team and spectators in the background.
This player with the blue helmet was at bat and just finished swinging at the ball during a team baseball game.
A baseball player swinging at a ball while fans and the other team watch.
Observers and Players watch a batting from a batter at a game.
Baseball player in black and gray uniform swinging at ball.
A middle-aged woman with middle length brown hair in khaki pants, a long-sleeve blue shirt, and a long long gold jacket is walking in the subway station.
A woman in her early fifties walks by herself in the subway, another woman is not far behind.
Woman in a gold jacket walking on a New York subway platform.
The woman in the gold coat hurries to catch the subway.
A woman in a gold jacket waiting in the subway.
A man dressed in dark colors and a hat plays his guitar on the side of the road.
Man standing on the sidewalk next to the street holding a guitar.
A man in a suit and hat is playing the guitar on the street.
A man with a top hat is playing guitar on the sidewalk.
A man on the street playing a guitar.
A woman in a yellow and red outfit is squinting at a computer screen while holding a mouse.
A woman wearing a yellow sweater and red vest working at a computer.
A woman in a brown vest is working on the computer.
A woman in a red vest working at a computer.
An older woman on the computer
One bald man is putting on a tie, which matches his button-down shirt, while looking into the mirror.
A clean-shaven man getting dressed in a purple shirt and tie in front of the mirror.
A short-haired man adjusting his tie with the help of the mirror in his hotel room.
A man using the bathroom mirror to tie his tie.
A man looking in the mirror fixing his tie.
An elderly women is sitting in a chair on one side of a room with a group of musicians, including a cellist and guitar player, and on the other side of the room, a group of people are sitting on chairs.
Music being played by several individuals while a happy crowd sits and listens.
There are musicians performing fro a small group of people.
There is a band playing for a small audience.
A string quartet dazzles their audience.
A woman in a dress walking down the street past a construction site.
A woman with high heels and a purse is walking on the sidewalk.
A blond woman walking down the sidewalk in a cheetah dress.
A woman in a dress walks past a construction zone.
A blond woman walking in heels.
Man standing at a counter in a convenience store with a woman on the other side of the counter wearing a white shirt looking at him very expectantly.
A man in a striped t-shirt and khakis stands at the counter of a convenience store while the female attendant faces him.
A man touches his back pocket as a blond woman behind the counter of a convenience store looks at him.
A clerk in a convenience store asks a customer buying alcohol for his age and identification.
A guy ready to make a purchase at a small shop.
A guy with a backpack and orange bag walks past a large building.
A dark-haired man wearing a backpack is walking down the street.
A man is wearing a black backpack and carrying a brown bag.
A man strolls down a sidewalk, holding an orange bag.
A man wearing a backpack is walking down the street.
A blond pregnant woman in a black shirt is standing in the kitchen with her hand on her belly holding something in her mouth.
A woman with blond-hair wearing a black shirt is standing, looking down in a home kitchen.
A blond woman in a black shirt standing in a kitchen.
A woman in black is holding something in her mouth.
A girl posing in the kitchen.
A man dressed in a checkered shirt and black pants performs an aerial stunt on a bicycle.
A young man with a blue checkered shirt is doing bike tricks on a half pipe.
A man on a bike that is doing a trick.
A BMX biker shoots up into the air.
A man riding his bike up the ramp.
A woman in a black tank top holding her purse on one shoulder is looking at something in the distance while wind glows her light brown hair across her face.
A woman wearing a black tank top and a cross necklace stares off into the distance near sunset.
A woman with long blond-hair walks in front of a parked white car.
A blond woman shows her profile in front of a white luxury car.
A tattooed blond woman is holding a purse.
A guy wearing shorts and a white t-shirt is skateboarding down the road, while someone sits and watches him from the curb.
A young man sits on the curb while another rides a skateboard with green wheels down the street.
A male is riding a skateboard on a road while another male sits and watches from the curb.
A man is skateboarding on a road while another man watches from the sidewalk.
A kid riding a skateboard.
A man in a black leather jacket and blue jeans standing in front of a sign by Architects &amp; Engineers that says "9-11 was an inside job."
A man is standing next to a billboard advertising 9-11 conspiracy theories.
A man in leather jacket is standing next to a 9-11 conspiracy theory sign.
A man in a black leather coat is standing in front of a sign.
Man standing by 9-11 poster
A woman in a white tank top is holding a microphone and singing with a man in a brown shirt, who is also holding a microphone.
A man in a brown shirt and a woman in a white tank top singing into their microphones.
A male and female singing a song together outside.
A man and a woman on stage at an outdoor venue.
A black man and white woman sing together.
A man is holding a young woman around the waist inside a square of yellow crime scene tape.
A woman acts out a dramatic scene in public behind yellow caution tape.
A woman leans against a man surrounded by yellow caution tape.
Two dancers are performing within a caution-tape boundary.
A man and woman are embracing behind caution tape.
A man in a gray shirt smoking a cigarette and getting something to eat.
A man with a cigarette in his mouth fixing a plate of food.
Young man with a cigarette placing food on a paper plate.
A man in a tank top fixing himself a hotdog.
A man in a gray wife beater grilling.
Eleven people gather in lake, group on left are male and conversing, group on right, male and female, walking further out into lake.
Two groups of shirtless men are in the water in the distance.
A group of people standing in a lake.
Ten people swimming in calm water.
Two groups of swimmers wade out.
A black dress mannequin, with a wooden leg stand, positioned next to a suitcase, and a female dressed in a gray sweater and black pants, reading a newspaper, in a crowded city square.
People sit on a bench in a city square with random objects including a lamp and a dressmakers form standing nearby.
People sitting on concrete benches and walking, with a headless mannequin next to a lamp.
Several people are outside sitting on a long bench either working or resting.
A group of people and a headless, legless mannequin are in a park.
A policeman looking away from the camera with a couple cars, other policemen, and other people in the background all in front of a building.
An officer in a black uniform and hat stands to the left of a large structure with other officers in the background.
A man in uniform is standing in front of a large building.
A guard is on the look out while on duty.
Men in uniform are standing on a street.
Two men wearing orange robes and sandals are standing in front of the Bean in Millenium Park, Chicago.
Two men dressed in dark orange coverings and sandals stand near a large reflective sculpture.
Two men standing in front of the bean in Chicago.
Two men in robes next to a large structure.
Two monks are visiting a big city.
A man with a messenger bag stands on a busy street corner.
A man and a woman are standing on the street in the city.
A man and woman wait to cross a busy street in the city.
A man and a woman standing on a street corner.
A woman and a man at a crosswalk in nyc.
Two people in orange shirts sits at a table on the right of a group of people in blue shirts in front an old building.
A crowd of people sitting at picnic tables in front of a brick, historic-looking building.
A crowd of people gathered in a public place outdoors sitting at picnic tables.
This is a large group of people sitting outside on benches.
People are sitting at tables.
Three surgeons operate on a patient while wearing magnifying lenses on their safety glasses.
Two doctors are working on a surgical procedure.
The doctors are involved in an operation.
Doctors performing some type of surgery.
Two doctors perform an operation.
A man smoking a cigarette and wearing a NY baseball cap is looking down at a camera.
A man smoking a cigarette and wearing a yankees hat trying to operate a camera.
An older man with a cigarette in his mouth and a ball cap inspects his camera.
A man wearing a tank-top and a baseball cap holding a camera.
Man smoking, while inspecting his camera.
A band is of four members including a woman and three men are playing their instruments with an open guitar case in front of them.
A group of musicians plays outdoors with an open guitar case in front of them.
A musical street quartet performs with a guitar case set out for donations.
Small orchestra playing with open violin case in front
Four people playing instruments on a public place.
A man in a red suit is dancing with a woman in a red skirt, in the street.
A man with a red suit is dancing with a lady.
A homely looking woman is doing a dance.
The two man are dancing in the street.
Two people, dressed in red, dancing.
A baby girl wearing a harness is lying on the ground crying.
Harnessed Asian child lying on ground in front of stroller.
A child is laying on the ground next to a stroller.
The child is having a meltdown on the ground.
A child in a harness laying on the sidewalk.
A man in a gray jacket and blue cap shops with other people at the fish market.
A lot of people at the market looking at various different things.
Men in casual attire browsing an outdoor fish market.
A man wearing a jacket, hat and jeans at a market
People are shopping for fish at a market.
A young blond man and another young man are playing guitars hooked up to amps.
Two young men playing electric guitars in a grunge-type setting.
Two young men play electric guitars on stage.
Two men are playing guitar in a band.
Two guys playing the guitar
A tattooed man pouring beer out of a bottle into a young man's mouth.
A tattooed man pours a beer into the mouth of a thin blond man.
A tattooed man on a stage pours beer into another man's mouth.
Man serving another man a beer without using a cup.
Two guys drinking beer outside on a bench.
A man and a woman are standing at the side of an inflatable climbing structure.
Two people stand next to an inflatable obstacle course with hand holds.
Two people are standing around in front of an inflated blob machine.
Two people standing outside next to blow up toys and dumpsters.
Two people are looking at an inflatable climbing wall.
An old women in pink and wearing hat is squeezing her eyes while looking at something.
Older women in pink shit and gray hat looking at something.
An older woman is standing wearing a pink shirt and a hat.
Two older women outside set against a cityscape.
Woman in a pink shirt and wearing glasses.
A woman in a red shirt raising her arm to the passing crowd below.
A woman in a red shirt is raising her arm to the crowd below.
A person in red with their hand raised and fingers stressed.
Woman in red looking over the celebration parade below.
Someone looking at a mass of people in the street.
A child with long hair wearing a pink shirt is looking through a tourist telescope near a beach.
A little girl is looking through a telescope at the beach.
A child looks through a binocular station near the beach.
Girl child looking through a telescope in a serene setting
A girl looking through binoculars.
Two workers, one in a ditch and one standing on the ground, are working in front of a house.
Several construction workers with orange safety vests are digging into the ground.
A man in a reflective vest stands in a hole in the ground.
A black man in a reflective vest standing in a dirt hole.
A man working in the ground in the dirt looking away.
A person wearing a hooded jacket and blue jeans stands facing a shop with the sign "Feelings" on it.
A person in a hood is standing in front of a run down building.
A man standing on a street waiting to cross the road
A man waits at a light to cross the street.
A man is attempting to cross the street.
A man with a white headscarf and an I Love NY t-shirt is among several men picketing against PM Construction Services.
Protesters holding picket signs up, man in center with a blue I&lt;3NY shirt.
A group of men protesting with signs that say; "PM construction services."
Construction workers picketing against PM Construction Services.
Protesters joining on a city street.
A man in a sombrero on a chestnut horse is ahead of several other men on horses.
Four horses with cowboy riders running near a fifth horse that has no rider.
A man riding a running horse with some other men doing the same behind him.
Hispanics are on horseback trying to wrangle a free horse.
Cowboys are riding on horses in a dirt field.
Brown-haired girl wearing a green tank top, talking on a cellphone.
A woman in a tank top, walks through a market on her cellphone.
A woman in a green-patterned shirt is talking on a cellphone.
A girl in a green shirt talking on a cellphone.
Young woman in market talking on cellphone.
An african child carries an infant in swaddling cloth on her back.
A child carries his younger sibling in a cloth sling on his back.
A small African child carries a younger child on his back.
African girl with a small boy tied to her back by fabric.
A young boy giving his brother a piggyback ride
Even in cooler weather men will get out and play with their model planes.
A man in dark clothing watches a model airplane fly above an empty field.
A man is looking at a small plane flying in the air.
A man in a field with an airplane in view.
A man is watching something in the sky.
A black dog is running across the grass carrying something in its mouth.
Black dog is carrying something in its mouth and running in the grass.
A black dog runs along the green grass carrying a toy in its mouth.
A black dog runs on green grass with a toy in his mouth.
A black dog is running outside with a toy in its mouth.
A lady standing in front of a lot of elementary school aged children who are sitting on the floor.
A large group of kids sitting on the floor listening to a lady in a blue dress.
A woman is standing and talking to a group of children.
A group of students sit and listen to the speaker.
The kids are listening to their teacher.
A man with an orange shirt and sunglasses along with a young boy and train conductor ride a children's train through a park.
A man in an orange shirt and a blond boy are riding with other people on a "Pullman" vehicle.
People sitting and waving in a mini Pullman train.
Man and his son wave as they ride a small train.
People on a miniature train.
A man in a black hat and blue shirt taking a picture on the side of an urban street.
A man on a city street takes a picture while a taxi and bus drive by.
A man wearing a black hat taking a photo in a busy street.
A man with a hat is taking a photo in a busy city.
A tourist photographing tall buildings.
Male in the street wearing a blue plaid shirt waiting for the light to turn.
A middle-aged man standing in the middle of a crowd looking the other way.
A man is standing on a busy street looking with his head tilted up.
Man with plaid shirt staring off into the distance.
A man in a blue plaid shirt looking up.
Two women wearing jeans and a man wearing shorts walking up a gravel mountain road carrying backpacks.
Three people are walking up a mountain trail, while one woman is looking at her camera.
Three people are hiking down a long gravel trail with scenic green hills behind them.
Three people, with backpacks hiking along a dirt road through the mountains.
Three hikers a traversing a trail as a young lady inspects her camera.
Children play in the dark water fountain near the white triumphal arch while adults sit on the steps.
People cooling off in a fountain, a woman in a white dress sits on the edge looking on.
A group of children play in a public fountain while others sit where it is dryer.
A man in blue shorts and sitting in the pool watches a boy get out of the water.
People are sitting around and playing in a fountain.
A bunch of people walking inside a shopping center.
Busy Asian mall with paper lanterns and shoppers.
People are walking through a shopping center.
People walking through the mall.
People walking around in a mall.
A girl in a green sweatshirt checks out at a store filled with Pokemon items.
A store with pokemon items and pokemon balls in front of the registers.
A young man in a green shirt is making a purchase at a store.
People are looking at children's toys in a store.
People are busy shopping at a grocery store.
An aging man in a green and orange palm tree shirt and straw hat holds a red drum and a drumstick.
A man with a hat is playing the drum in the street.
An older man in a tropical shirt plays a drum.
A man in a straw hat playing the drum.
An elderly man playing a drum.
A woman lounges on a towel in front of people enjoying the blue water.
A woman in a two piece swimsuit is on the beach looking at her foot.
A woman in a purple bikini sunbathes on a towel beside water.
A girl on a swimsuit stretching her leg next to the beach
A young women sunbathes at the sea.
A black man stands behind a garbage can with his hand raised in front of a sign urging people to repent of various sins as boy in a school blazer holds the hand of a man in shorts.
A man is holding a strange sign while a little boy and his parent are walking by.
The African American man protests against unlawful sex.
Man standing by a poster of religious beliefs.
A black man exercising his religious freedom.
At least one woman and several men are standing around outside an office building.
High class group of business people including older men have drinks in park.
A group of people in semi-formal attire meet outside.
A group of people stand in front of a small gate.
People stand outside behind a railing.
Three people, two in black and one in yellow, are seated on a wooden bench, only their heads and shoulders visible, in front of a sign for a furniture showroom &amp; restaurant.
The lady wearing black rimmed glasses and a yellow sweater jacket looks confused as she sits on the tan covered bench.
Two women talking to one another while a man looks on.
Two young women discuss something while waiting.
Three people are sitting on a wooden bench.
A man wearing a brown shirt embellished on the front with black designs drinks from a water fountain shaped like a woman.
A man with blond-hair, and a brown shirt drinking out of a public water fountain.
A red-haired young man drinks from a water fountain shaped like a woman.
A boy is drinking out of a water fountain shaped like a woman.
A blond man is drinking from a public fountain.
A young child wearing a red hat and a tag "513" participant tag rides a horse.
A young boy in a red hat rides on a horse.
A little boy in a red hat riding a horse.
A child in a red hat is riding a horse.
Young boy in red hat riding a horse.
A boy wearing shorts, crocs, and a white shirt plays with a yo-yo while another boy looks at his yo-yo in the background.
A kid with white shirt and gray shorts and croc shoes is playing with a yo-yo
Two boys are playing on the sidewalk.
A young boy is playing with a yo-yo.
Two kids playing with toys
Two boys are looking upwards with their arms streteched to the sky, the boy on the left is wearing a blue vest jacket with a gray long-sleeved shirt and black jogging pants, and black tennis shoes and a hat, and the boy on the right is wearing a silver vest jacket, with blue long-sleeved undershirt, gray pants, and black tennis shoes and has black short hair and glasses.
Two boys are looking up at the sky and waving theirs arms and they are dressed in clothes to keep them warm.
Two boys in long-sleeve shirts are reaching and staring upward.
Two people waving their hands in the air and looking up.
The children are looking upward while waving their arms.
Asian school children are on a field trip listening to a speech, except for one girl who is posing for the camera.
A youth wearing a shirt and tie crouching down and giving the peace sign.
A group of Asian students in their uniforms.
An asian girl is flashing the peace-sign.
A girl is holding up the peace sign.
Two young men walk toward the camera, with the redheaded man on the left turning his head to look back at three women in the background who are walking away in the other direction.
A young man walking with another young man glances back at three girls they just passed
Two men walking, one of which is looking back and the other looking directly ahead.
A young man wearing a blue jacket is turning his head.
Two young people walk down a sidewalk in jackets.
Four adults and a little blond girl walk up a set of outside stairs lead by a lady in a pink shirt.
Five people walking up a set of stairs led by a woman in a pink shirt and brown skirt.
A group of people walking up stairs surrounded by buildings covered in graffiti.
A woman wearing a p blouse walks up a flight of stairs.
People climbing up stairs with graffiti behind them.
A young woman with a shave head in a brown skirt and sandals walking past a stone building.
A teenage girl with a shaved head walks in a brown skirt and blue jean jacket.
The girl with a shaved head is walking outside on the sidewalk.
A woman wearing a denim jacket walking along a sidewalk
Girl with shaved head walks on path beside building.
A boy and a girl are sitting on a bench looking at something they each have in a small paper cup.
Children sitting on a bench eating something out of a small cup.
Two small children sitting on a bench while eating ice cream.
Two children sit side by side while eating a treat.
Two kids sitting at a table eating.
A little boy with a blue bike helmet and a woman in a green bike helmet are riding bikes down a street with other various bike riders.
People are riding bicycles in the street, and they are all wearing helmets.
A group of people ride bicycles on a large city street.
Asian people ride their bikes in the street.
Many people outside on bicycles.
A man wearing blue jeans, a blue shirt, and a green hat is holding a loudspeaker on a city street.
A man in a blue t-shirt is speaking into a blow horn towards a large group of people with bicycles.
A man in a blue shirt speaking on a loudspeaker to a large group of people on bicycles.
Crowds of people are all riding bicycles.
Whole Foods hosts a "City Picnic."
A man riding a vehicle pulled by a donkey in the run down area of town.
A man seated on a platform with wheels is being pulled by a burrow.
A man on a cart encourages his mule to keep pulling.
A man riding a cart pulled by a donkey.
A man is being pulled by a donkey.
A man in a black hat and jacket is riding his bicycle.
A man is riding a bike inside of a structure.
A man on a bicycle pedals through an archway.
A man in black is riding his bike.
A man on a bike in the city area.
Two men, dressed in business suits, wearing long black coats, sharing a blue plaid umbrella, standing against a graffiti painted brick wall.
Two young men in long jackets stand under an umbrella in front of a brick wall with graffiti.
Two men in suits standing under an umbrella, next to a wall covered in graffiti.
Two men in suits under an umbrella and in front of graffiti.
Two men in black holding an umbrella in the street.
Four people walking beside each other down a street, one of the men is turned around looking toward the camera.
A man in a black t-shirt and jeans in standing on the sidewalk looking at the camera as people walk by.
A man in a black shirt and jeans standing on the sidewalk looking at the camera.
Three people walk away from the camera, and a man in a black shirt looks back.
A man turning to have his picture taken, as his 3 friends continue walking away
Overhead shot of 2 teenagers both looking at a shirt being held up by one of them.
A boy and girl standing together on the pavement as they look at an object.
Two people consult a map on the interior of a traffic circle.
Two people looking a piece of paper standing on concrete.
A couple looking at a map.
A woman with a dog sitting on a bench near the ocean.
A woman and a dog sit on a bench in front of a beach.
A woman and a dog sit on a white bench near a beach.
A woman in a swimsuit sitting on a bench with a dog.
White bench looking out onto the ocean with dog.
A woman in an all black outfit holds her glasses while she stands in the street in front of a sandwich board advertising menu items.
A woman dressed in black boots, black jacket, and a black hat wonders who is taking this picture of her.
A woman wearing black pants and black jacket is holding a pair of glasses.
A woman wearing all black and carrying a black bag on sidewalk
A woman wearing all black looking at something.
A group of men gathered around a table preparing to play a card game.
Group of men sitting around a table having a conversation.
Several elderly men are grouped around a table.
A group of men sits around a table.
Seniors gathered around a table.
A woman with blond-hair is sitting in a booth with a drink working on her laptop.
As I slave over this assignment, I cautiously click on the answer!
A woman working on her computer in front of a bright yellow wall.
Woman sitting at a table while working on her laptop computer.
A woman in a white shirt working on her laptop.
A man with gray hair and a bear sits in a chair on the street with a guitar by his side.
An old man sits outside with his guitar, watching an younger generation pass by.
An elderly man sitting outside on a chair with a guitar next to him.
A man sits in a chair watching people stroll by.
Man playing guitar on the street
Two people wearing hats are standing in a field tending to a crop.
A man and a woman work in a field, both wearing large hats.
Two workers in sunhats are bent over in a rice paddy.
Two gardeners are pruning a stretch of leafy plants.
These two workers are working in the green field.
A female athlete performing a high jump during a competition in Barcelona in 2010.
A female athlete is high jumping at the 2010 Barcelona.
A woman doing a high jump at an Olympic meet.
Some leaping over a high bar in Barcelona.
A woman midair vaulting over a bar.
Two little girls sitting on the edge of a street eating corn on the cob.
Two young girls eating corn on the cob on a sidewalk without shoes.
Two girls enjoy corn on the cob while sitting on a curb.
Two young girls are sitting on the street eating corn.
Two cute little girls enjoying corn on the cob.
Three children in football uniforms of two different teams are playing football on a football field, while another player and an adult stand in the background.
One young football player in a white jersey being tackled by another player in a blue jersey from the opposing team whose teammate is coming to assist him.
A football player is being tackled by members of the opposing team.
A football player for the East Lake team takes down his opponent.
The boys wearing the purple uniforms tackled number 25.
A man with a blue shirt sitting on a bed and another man with a tan colored shirt and glasses laying on a bed.
A man with glasses looks at camera while another man in a blue shirt looks intently at something.
A man smiles for the camera as he watches his friend work on a television beside him.
Two men are in a room and are looking in opposite directions.
Two men looking at a computer.
Three young men in a kitchen standing around a stove, one of them is stirring something in a pot.
A white man is cooking in a home kitchen while another white man and a black man watch.
A man cooks with a pot on the stove in the kitchen, two other men observe.
Man preparing food while two others watch.
3 men cooking in a small kitchen.
A young blond girl is sitting in a wooden chair backwards, looking into the distance.
A little girl wearing pink clothes is sitting in a rocking chair while looking back.
A young girl is sitting backwards on a chair, looking over the back of it.
A young girl sitting on a wooden chair.
A girl sitting on a chair backwards.
A young boy uses a flashlight to inspect something in a sidewalk grate.
Two people working on welding metal together outside on a sidewalk.
Two workers weld the bars of a fence near a busy suburban street.
A man in blue is using a tool on a metal piece of fence.
Men spot welding on a the sidewalk of a city street.
A little girl with blond-hair is playing and splashing in a mud puddle.
A little girl finds joy in playing in a big, sloppy area of mud!
A little blond girl splashing in a mud puddle.
A naked little girl splashing in a mud puddle
A naked little girl plays in a mud puddle.
A man in a long gray gown and hat is standing with his hand on a mule that is wearing blankets and decorations on a stone street outside of a building, with a number of other people in the background.
Man clothed in a traditional dress like attire, while standing next to his mule who also seems to be clothed as well.
A man and his donkey stand along a sidewalk.
A man in an alley with his mule.
Older man stands by his donkey.
A man with his arms outspread who looks like he is filled with ecstatic joy is jumping vigorously from old, weathered, yellowed stairs as a man in a green shirt beneath him is lying on his back and seeming to be photographing him or making a video of what is happening.
A man poses in an awkward position for a photographer laying on the ground.
A photographer taking a picture of a man jumping down the stairs.
A man jumps and poses for photographers lying on the ground.
A man posing for the camera on steps.
A man in a white hoodie is sitting on top of bamboo scaffolding near the roof of a building holding a spade.
A man on a scaffold in front of a house is smiling and posing for the photographer.
Under sunny skies, a worker helps in the framing of new building.
A construction worker prepping for roof work.
A smiling man is holding a tool.
A large, green, navigating wheel is held by an older man in a captain's hat and uniform.
The smiling ship captain is holding the wheel of his wooden ship.
An older man in nautical gear smilingly turns a ship wheel.
Pictured is the captain of a boat; he is steering.
A boat captain steering a large green wheel.
A man moves dirt using a large construction vehicle.
A man in a black shirt uses a yellow bulldozer.
A man operating a large yellow bulldozer.
A yellow bulldozer working to move dirt.
A wheel loader picking up some dirt.
A young woman is wearing a red shirt, black riding helmet, black pants, and black shoes, while riding in a saddle on a white horse.
A woman in a red shirt is riding an all white horse that is galloping along the trees.
A woman is riding her horse over dirt ground with tall trees in the background.
A woman in a red shirt and black pants riding a white horse on brown grass.
A person in a red shirt and black pants is riding a white horse.
A red-haired woman in a tank top and rolled up jeans sits atop a large rock in a wooded park, smiling at the camera.
A woman in a dark tank top and cuffed jeans is smiling while sitting on top of a large rock or boulder outdoors.
A woman sitting on a very large rock smiling at the camera with trees in the background.
A woman with black sunglasses is posing for a photo on top of a large rock outdoors.
A woman reclines on top of a large rock with green trees in the background.
A small girl in a bathing suit jumps above a kiddie pool.
A child is jumping into an inflatable swimming pool.
A little girl plays in a blow up pool.
A girl plays in an inflatable pool.
A girl plays in a small pool.
A man wearing a hat is showing a group of children how to throw a net off of a dock.
A fisherman throws his net off of a pier in the early morning or late evening.
A man throws a net off of a boat while children watch.
A man throws a fishing net into the bay.
Man in silhouette casts net into water.
A young, male adult wearing blue jeans, a green reflective vest, work gloves and a hard hat stood between the rails of a railroad track to the rear of a white truck that is specially built to roll on the tracks.
A man wearing a gray shirt, blue jeans and a neon green safety vest is standing on a railroad track with a white truck and a white building in the background.
A person in a bright yellow vest and hard hat is standing by the railroad tracks.
A worker in a yellow vest stands on train tracks.
A man in a vest works outside.
A shirtless man with multiple earrings, a necklace, and holding drumsticks, is voicing into a microphone behind cymbals.
A guy performing a song shirtless with a tattoo of a safety pen on his body with a second tattoo on his body.
A punk looking gentleman with ear piercings, a mohawk, and tattoos playing the drums and singing.
A rocker with his shirt off sings into a microphone while he plays the drums.
Punk rocker playing the drums and singing.
A woman in a white top and khaki pants exercising on a piece of exercise equipment.
A woman wearing a white shirt works out on an elliptical machine.
An older lady uses a Stair Climber in non-work out clothes.
Woman on a fitness machine in an untidy house.
A woman exercises on an elliptical machine.
Two girls, one older and in black and one younger and in white, are performing the same ballet move in front of decorations made from balloons.
Two women, one in black and one in white, are standing on one foot in front of a window that states, "Babys" in green and yellow balls.
Two young ballerinas pose before a sign reading "babys".
Two dancers are practicing ballet technique.
Two dancers practicing together.
A woman in a flowing blue robe with a white wave pattern is dancing in front of a large brick building with other dancers similarly attired in the background.
A small group of women in traditional dark blue and white kimonos and sandals dancing in front of a tall brown brick church.
Four Asian women performing a dance in traditional, Oriental attire, outside a church with onlookers watching.
Several women are performing a dance in front of a building.
Several people dancing outside a building.
An Asian man walking down an alley talking on his cellphone with brightly colored fabric behind him.
A bald man walking down a city sidewalk while talking on his cellphone.
A man talks on a cellphone while walking through an empty alley.
Chinese male on his cellphone walking through the alley.
A man walks down the alley talking on his cellphone.
Possibly a preschool teacher trying to explain something to her class, the little mouse could care less.
A woman in orange performs with puppets while a little boy in a monkey costume walks by.
A child dressed as a monkey walks in front of a woman playing with finger puppets.
A woman plays with finger puppets as a small child in a costume walks by.
An adult performing a finger puppet show with a young child in a costume.
A group of people watch young men play the drums using makeshift buckets as instruments.
There are two street musicians playing percussion, while a crowd of people look on.
A crowd of people on the street gathering to watch several young men put on a show.
Bare chested Black men play drums on makeshift paint buckets to a pleased crowd.
A crowd of people are watch two guys play buckets.
A woman is sitting on some stairs outside with several baskets filled with craft items and miniature dolls at her feet and next to her for sale.
A woman is sitting on the steps looking at a collection of trinkets.
Woman and dog selling her wares on the old building steps outside.
A woman sits in a market where she sells goods with her dog.
Woman in white dress selling items on the stairs.
Important political man in gray suit talks to man in darker green suit about the woman in the lighter green jacket.
A woman and two men, that are dressed professionally, are having a discussion.
Two men and a woman standing in a circle having a conversation.
Two men and a woman are having a conversation.
Politicians are talking to each other.
Several men are sitting on their motorcycles wearing a red shirt with a black vest and black hat.
Eight men on motorcycles dressed in red and black are all lined up on the side of the street.
A group of men in matching red and black outfits ride in a line on their motorcycles.
A group of men in red and black jackets waits on motorcycles.
A row of bikers wearing red and black.
A soccer player is on the field with his arms out, about to kick the ball.
A guy dressed in a white uniform with a number 3 on it playing soccer.
A man wearing a number 3 jersey is about to kick a soccer ball.
A man with a number 3 soccer uniform kicking a soccer ball.
A man is kicking a soccer ball.
A guy inside a sports arena wearing a yellow shirt and black cap is holding up a red bag containing snacks and a bottle containing something to drink.
A food vendor holds up a bag of snacks and a bottle as he stands in the crowd at a sports venue.
A vendor in a yellow shirt and black cap presents his wares at a baseball game.
A man is hawking refreshments at a sports game.
A man is selling snacks at a sporting event.
A young girl in a blue shirt is in a bowling alley, and is casting her ball down a lane.
A person in blue is the only person currently throwing their ball at a bowling alley.
A woman with a blue shirt and colorful hair has just thrown the bowling ball.
A woman in a blue shirt releasing a bowling ball at a bowling lane.
A girl bowling at a bowling alley.
Soccer players dressed in bright blue and white uniforms are jumping in the air.
Two young men playing soccer on a sunny day are jumping for the soccer ball.
Soccer players in blue and white fight for the ball in midair.
Several football players on a field in action.
Three boys are playing soccer.
Am upset young boy is sitting on a skateboard, on some stairs, and is holding a phone.
Young man sitting on a skateboard, holding a cellphone, and posing on the escalator.
A boy in a gray striped shirt sitting on stairs with a skateboard.
A boy is sitting on an escalator holding a phone.
Boy sits on his skateboard on the elevators.
A female runner dressed in blue athletic wear is running in a competition, while spectators line the street.
A young woman is running a marathon in a light blue tank top and spandex shorts.
A lady dressed in blue running a marathon.
A woman who is running, with blue shorts.
Runner named Kim, running in the street.
A group of men and women dressed is formal black dresses and suits holding their music books and singing.
This band is getting ready to perform in front of an audience at church.
A Choir wearing all black performing on a stage.
A group of young adults singing in a choir.
A choir of youths are singing.
On a sunny, dry day, wearing full football gear, a Texas A&amp;M football player tries to reach an Iowa State football player, for the football during the game.
An offensive player running with a football while a football player tries to stop him during a football game.
A football player from Iowa State blocks a player from Texas A&amp;M from taking the football from him.
The Iowa State football player blocks a Texas A&amp;M defenseman while running with the ball.
# 8 for Iowa State stiff arms a Texas AM player attempting to tackle him.
A basketball player from Penn State dribbles a ball while being surrounded by Lafayette players.
A basketball game showing Lafayette player number 32 and Penn State player number 23.
A basketball player in white squats while a player in red moves toward him.
Men from Lafayette and Penn State are playing basketball.
The two college basketball teams are playing a game.
A football player dressed in a white uniform is preparing to throw the ball.
A football quarterback dropping back and planting his feet to throw a pass.
A football player in a white jersey readies himself to make a long throw.
A football player in a white uniform is holding a football.
A football player wearing white and green has a football.
Multiple teenagers outdoors racing against each other while sitting on bouncing balls.
Three kids are bouncing on large rubber balls in a grass field as other people watch.
Spectators laugh as three people ride exercise balls down a field.
Three woman bouncing on balls in the grass.
A race between friends at the park.
A man and woman, dressed in white, embrace each other while their actions go unnoticed to the other people in the background.
An older man is hugging a younger woman in a dark room with people in the background.
An old man with glasses hugs a young woman at a gathering of quite a few people.
A man and a woman in white shirts are hugging each other.
The young lady is giving the old man a hug.
An older man who appears to be in his sixty's, seems to be doing some type of magical form of play with three children and an adult female, being his targeted group.
A man talking to a family unit holding some sort of probing device as they look on and smile to be polite.
Family trying to be polite as street magician in trendy Merrell shoes approaches them.
Street magician showing an act to a group of 5 people in a city.
A man is giving some kind of magic presentation to a family.
A very tired little boy's taking advantage of bed setting in a department store to get some rest.
A child resting on a bed at a furniture store waiting for his mom to get done shopping.
A very young boy wearing a green long-sleeve shirt is laying on a bed at a store.
Very young boy in a green shirt laying face down on a white bed.
Tired little boy lays down on a display bed at a store.
A woman smiles as she skis, wearing a white winter hat, a white coat, and a blue hoodie, while snow is in the background.
A young woman is smiling towards the camera as she attempts to pull herself up a hill while skiing.
A female skier holding two ski poles wearing a white knit hat.
A woman is skying in a snowy area wearing warm clothing.
A smiling lady is skiing in extremely cold weather.
Several girls and one woman are working on a project in front of a table covered with many objects.
Several ladies gathered around a table engaged in an electronics project
Four girls and a lady learning how to do some crafts.
Four females are doing some crafts activity.
There are five people working at a table.
A man with a striped shirt, blue jeans and a red kerchief in his pocket is being thrown off a brown irate horse while a brown and tan horse is buckling while the crowd is watching
A man in a black and white striped shirted tries to wrangle a horse at the rodeo while another man does the same just behind him.
A rodeo scene with a big crowd watching three men being thrown from bucking broncos.
A man wearing black and white stripes is trying to stop a horse.
A man at a rodeo who may have fell off the horse.
A woman presents a bar code for a smartphone so that a man can use his phone to find the location associated with the code.
The gentleman is scanning the image that the woman in the blue shirt is providing him.
A man with a beard checks his cellphone while a lady looks on.
A man is photographing a piece of paper with his smartphone.
Three people drinking and having a good time.
A woman with short red-hair is in some very cloudy water by a shoreline and only her head is above the water.
A lady with red-hair is submerged from the neck down in what looks like cold water.
A smiling young girl swimming in a lake or river that has murky water.
A woman with red-hair is neck deep in cloudy blue water.
Teen female enjoys going swimming.
Two young boys sitting on a sunlit floor smiling and holding a black lab puppy.
Two little boys smiling and holding a tiny, black puppy.
Two young boys pose with a puppy for a family picture.
Two little boys in polos, are holding a black lab.
Two children sitting with a black puppy.
Several children are practicing martial arts moves in a room with a red floor.
Young children are performing karate moves while their teachers look on.
There are several kids practicing in a taekwondo class.
Four children practice karate while two adults watch.
A karate instructor observes his students.
A racing car with man ads emblazoned on it rounds a corner on a racetrack with two cars close behind it.
Race car flies by, in the lead of the pack, closely followed by second and third places!
Hatchback red car racing around the track ahead of two trailing pray.
A red race car is rounding the corner, ahead of the other cars.
The red car is ahead of the two cars in the background.
A man with a gray jacket on that has a red and black stripe on the sleeve at a shooting range with multiple targets.
A boy firing a gun inside a shooting range
A boy at a gun range aims and shoots.
A boy aiming his gun at a target.
One boy at the shooting range.
A team plays ball in the sand as a few spectators look on from the stands.
Two teams of boys playing football in the sand.
The team of men are playing a game in the sand.
A group of men playing a game of rugby.
Young men playing football.
Two boys, one wearing a blue shirt, the other wearing a muscle shirt, facing each other on a brick wall, next to a culvert.
A child in blue and a child in white stand on a short concrete wall by a stream.
Two young boys stand on a low cement wall facing each other in a marshy area.
In this photo, two young boys are socializing by a pond.
Two kids are standing next to a small pond.
Woman with yellow button up shirt and jeans is making beautiful pottery etchings into one of her works of art.
A young adult woman in a white shirt is working on a clay vase with white flowers on it.
A woman in a yellow shirt is hand-decorating a vase on a green turntable.
A woman paints a brown vase with white flowers.
A woman draws a floral design on a clay pot.
A baseball pitcher is halfway through his motion of throwing the ball.
A baseball pitcher prepares to pitch the ball to the batter.
A right-handed pitcher for the Saints is throwing a pitch.
A baseball player for the Saints is pitching the baseball.
A man throws a pitch during a baseball game.
Two guys, one wearing a red costume and the other wearing a white top and black shorts, are playing beach volleyball.
Two men, one in black and white and one in red, are playing beach volleyball.
Two men, both with hats on, are playing volleyball on a beach.
A man on the beach jumps to hit a volleyball.
Two males playing volleyball on the beach.
A surfer has just fallen off his surfboard and only his feet are visible above the water.
A surfer who fell off his surfboard in the ocean while trying to ride a wave.
The feet are shown of a person who just fell off of their surfboard.
Two feet and a surfboard emerging from a wave.
Only feet are visible above the water.
An individual wearing blue latex gloves is compressing foods into juice with the aid of an instrument.
A person wearing blue rubber gloves is loading a syringe with vegetables.
A syringe filled with vegetables is being compressed into a liquid.
Someone is filling a large syringe with vegetables.
A technician preparing a sample in the lab.
A crowd of people run a marathon in a cityscape with two skyscrapers in the background.
Multiple people in running outfits are running with a cityscape in the background.
A group of runners are running towards two identical skyscrapers.
A large group of people are running a marathon through a city.
Many people run in a marathon through a city.
A skateboarder rides the bowl of a skate park while a man watches in the background.
A skateboarder rides up a concrete wall, nearly falling off as he tries a trick.
A man with long hair is skateboarding in a skate park surrounded by houses.
A young man with long hair practices skateboarding.
A long-haired male skateboarding.
Someone is lunging for a soccer ball near a net in a game of water soccer.
This captures two athletes playing a game of water Vally-ball.
There is a goalie in a swimming pool blocking the ball.
Two people are playing a water sport.
People playing a game in the pool.
A guy kisses another surprised looking man on the ear.
A man kissing another man on the cheek.
A man gets a kiss on the cheek.
A guy give a kiss to a guy also
Two gay men in a room kissing.
A group of people surrounding a man in a black and red striped shirt asking for his autograph.
Man with glasses and a red and black striped shirt, writing something down.
A man in a striped polo is signing autographs for children at a convention.
A man signs an autograph in a young boy's book.
A father showing his son something on paper.
Three musicians on a stage, two are guitarists, and one is wearing a hat, black striped pants, strumming a red electric guitar, and the other guitarist is strumming a white guitar while the other musician is wearing blue jeans and a black t-shirt and singing.
A man wearing striped pants and a black and white checked hat plays an electric guitar while a man holding a microphone and another man holding a guitar stand in the background.
A man in a black jacket and checkered hat wearing black and white striped pants plays an electric guitar on a stage with a singer and another guitar player in the background.
A rock band playing on stage with the lead guitarist wearing white striped pants and the lead singer in a black shirt and jeans with the bass player in the background.
At a rock concert a man dressed in black and white pants and a checked hat plays his red guitar while another man sings.
The back of a blond woman with braided hair playing tennis.
A woman in a blue shirt and white shorts playing tennis.
The young lady is hitting her tennis ball on the field.
She is hitting the tennis ball over the line.
A tennis player strikes the ball.
A man in a construction supply area, wearing blue jeans and bluish gray t-shirt, caries a bundle of metal on his shoulder
A man is carrying a large load of metal beams on his shoulder through a lumberyard.
A man carrying a large stack of metal poles over his shoulder.
A man is carrying metal beams in a supply yard.
A man carrying steel beams across a lumberyard.
A blond child is being bitten on the nose by a little orange kitten.
An orange striped kitten is biting a girl on the nose.
Orange striped kitten biting blond girl on the nose
A orange kitten biting the nose of a child.
A cat bites a human's nose.
Two women sit on a brown scooter, one is wearing blue jeans and a brown jacket, the other is carrying a bag and has on black pants and a black top with a green hat.
Two African american females ride on a moped down a city street that appears to be in a well congested area of a large city area.
Two Black women in a brown motorcycle amidst many other motorcycles with the woman in the rear giving a smile to the camera.
Two African American women without helmets are riding on a scooter, the passenger is waving to the camera.
Two women riding on a vespa, sadly only one is enjoying herself.
A group of people are getting fountain drinks at a convenience store.
Several adults are filling their cups and a drink machine.
Two guys getting a drink at a store counter.
Two boys in front of a soda machine.
People get their slushies.
A mountain bike rider wearing a helmet rides down a mountain trail with trees and a mountain ridge in the background.
Bicycle rider wearing black, riding down a dirt trail in a mountain bike.
Against a backdrop of scenic snowcapped mountains, a bike rider appears.
A man rides his mountain bike with mountains in the background.
A man is riding a bike on a steep tilt.
A woman cyclist wearing a white helmet, sunglasses, black long-sleeved shirt and black and pink biking shorts pedals straight toward the camera lens.
A woman in a mostly black outfit and white helmet riding a bike with blurred trees in the background.
Female bicyclist wearing black and red bicycle shorts and top and wearing white helmet.
A woman rides her bike with her white helmet and her biking shorts and top.
A woman in a cycling jersey rides a bicycle.
Five cyclists, all wearing the same uniforms, are riding one behind the other in a bicycle race.
A line of cyclists in identical clothing pedal on a curve in a race as spectators watch.
A line of bicyclists in a race rode past interested spectators a mere few feet away.
A team of cyclists rounds a bend while nearby spectators cheer and take photographs.
Four bicyclists in turquoise and striped tops are riding in a competition.
A player in a white and red uniform goes for a layup, while the player with a red and black uniform blocks the attempted shot.
3 basketball players vying for the ball and one in red jersey trying to take ball from guy in white jersey.
Four white guys playing basketball and looks like the white jersey is about to score over the red jersey.
Two young men playing basketball, one defending the other attempting to make a basket.
Two young men, one in a white jersey and one in a red jersey, playing basketball.
A young boy is either jumping on a trampoline or skateboarding and he is serious about it on a beautiful summer day.
This is a young boy looking to be jumping on the trampoline in a very beautiful neighborhood.
A guy is jumping and grabbing his foot with a house in the background.
A boy grimaces as he jumps high in the air.
A boy grabs his leg as he jumps in the air.
A boy is pushing an object with a handle while wearing sunglasses by a building with a blue and white striped awning.
A man is riding a scooter in front of a store.
A man wearing sunglasses is riding a scooter.
A boy riding his scooter with sunglasses on.
A man with sunglasses rides a scooter.
A young boy, dressed in a gray and blue baseball uniform, preparing to hit the ball off of the t-ball stand while onlookers watch from behind a chain link fence.
A small boy wearing baseball regalia holds a bat behind his head with a baseball mounted in front of him.
The little boy lifts his leg and swings the bat in an attempt to hit the ball.
A boy wearing a cubs uniform winds up to hit a ball on a tee.
A young boy about to hit a baseball off of the tee.
Six men are sitting or laying on a patch of earth in a wooded area.
A group of workers sitting in a field take a break from work.
A group of men are sitting in the farm fields taking a break
Six men sit in a field of crops containing wooden crates.
Pickers working out on a farm.
A dog with big ears is holding a small stick in its mouth.
A brown dog picks up a twig from a stone surface.
A puppy with big ears chewing on a stick.
A brown puppy chewing on a stick.
A puppy has a stick in its mouth.
There is lady with the white apron has an utensil standing over a wok, a man in blue shorts and blue shirt sitting down, a person in a pink shirt and others are in the background all in one place.
A lady attired in an apron stands over a kettle, preparing food, while patrons sit, chat, and dine in the background.
Woman with white apron cooks food, large group of people sitting at tables behind her.
A hispanic woman is using a outdoors wok to cook.
An Asian woman is cooking in an outdoor kitchen.
Marathon runners are racing on a city street, with other people standing around.
Two women runners in athletic shorts and bras going down a city street.
Runners who are competing sprint down the street.
A girl in black clothes leads the way in a race.
Runners in a race run down a busy street
Young boys are hanging out on the sidewalk next to trees, while one boy is exploring the dirt around the tree.
Some children are outside playing in the dirt where two trees are.
A child watches another play in the dirt near the street.
There are kids playing in the dirt beside the road.
A child is watching his friend by the tree.
A man, who is wearing the tan coat, is gambling at a casino slot machine.
And older man is playing a slot machine at a casino type environment.
An older man is playing a video arcade game.
An old man playing a game at the casino.
Man playing slots in a casino.